Entities collecting your personal information
Personal information we collect
How we use information we collect
Information we share
Information retention
Third Party Services
Children's guidelines
Your Californian Privacy Right
Information security
International transfer of personal information
When this privacy policy applies
Merger or sale
Changes
General
Product-specific details:
Website
Mobile app
Computer software
CyberLink Corporation General Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy
Last Update: February 2025. This CyberLink Corporation General Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy replace
                        and supersede all prior versions.
When you use our services, you trust us with your information. This Privacy Policy is intended to help you
                    understand
                    your right to privacy.
Our Privacy Policy explains:
What information we collect and why we collect it.
How we use that information.
The choices we offer, including how to access, update and manage your information.
We tried to keep this policy as simple, clear and easy to comprehend as possible. You should read this policy carefully in order to protect your right to privacy. You can always manage your
CyberLink membership account
anytime here.
Entities collecting your personal information
Personal information on the websites, including without limitation Cyberlink.com, DirectorZone and MyEdit ("Website"), various CyberLink's mobile apps ("Mobile App") and various CyberLink's computer software products ("Computer Software") products made by CyberLink is collected by CyberLink Corporation. CyberLink's address is 15F, 100, Minquan Road, Xindian District, New Taipei City, Taiwan, R.O.C. and our telephone number is +886-2-8667-1298. Information collected through the Website, Mobile Apps or Computer Software products made by CyberLink may be stored, transferred and processed by CyberLink.Com Corp. in the United States, CyberLink Corp. in Taiwan, and CyberLink Inc. in Japan (collectively, “CyberLink Group”). All transfers will occur in compliance with data transfer requirements of applicable laws and regulations.
Personal information we collect
We collect personal information to provide better services to all of our users – from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which ads you’ll find most useful to you. Personal information in this Privacy Policy refers to any information that could identify, locate, or contact a natural person. We collect personal information in the following ways:
Information you give us
As a website visitor, you can browse information exposed on our website without providing any personal information. If you engage in our events, download the trial version of our software or applications, register to become our website member, purchase our products or proceed any other activities related to CyberLink, you will be asked for your personal information. You have choices about the data we collect.
The information we collect can include the following:
Name and contact data
. We collect your first name, last name, display name, email address, postal address, phone number, and/or other similar contact information.
Demographic information.
We collect information about you such as your date of birth, country/region, and/or preferred language.
Comments and posts on online community forums, social media sites, blogs, mobile application platforms, online shopping platforms, and/or online software download sites.
We collect information on your comments, reviews, posts, feedback, surveys and interactions with other forum members you create, made or share in forums.
Information for customer service purposes.
We collect information on your comments, posts, feedback, editorial works, multimedia files, surveys, device information, unique customer ID and interactions with us.
Purchase/Payment data.
When you make purchases, we will collect your payment/purchase information and product/order information when it is necessary.
We may hold and associate any information you provide us with information gathered from other sources, including the social accounts that you choose to associate with your use of the services. Once you are registered at our website, you can view, edit, or delete your account information here after signing into your account.
Information we automatically collect
When you use our services, we automatically collect some information. We may collect information about your usage of and activity on our services. When you visit our websites, information we may automatically log includes, for example, your operating system, cookies, Internet protocol (IP) address, access times, browser type and language and the website that you visited before visiting our website.
This information includes:
Device information.
We collect device-specific information (such as your hardware model, operating system version, unique device identifiers and mobile network information). CyberLink may associate your device identifiers with your CyberLink Account.
Log information.
When you use our services provided by CyberLink, we automatically collect and store certain information in servers. Information we collects includes:
Internet protocol (IP) address.
device event information such as crashes, system activity, hardware settings, browser type, language, the date and time of your visit to our Website, Mobile App and/or Computer Software.
cookies that may uniquely identify your device or your CyberLink Account.
Location information.
When you use the service on our Website, Mobile App and/or Computer Software, we may collect and process information about your location, via various technologies including Internet protocol (IP) address which indicates a number assigned to every device connected to the Internet assigned in geographic blocks and other identifiers that may, for example, provide CyberLink with information on nearby devices, Wi-Fi access points.
Cookies and similar technologies.
Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a web browser. CyberLink uses cookies and similar technologies, for example, web beacons, to provide our websites and online services and to help collect data. Web beacons are electronic images we may use on our websites or in our emails to deliver cookies, count visits and understand usage and campaign effectiveness, such as whether you open and act on an email that we send you.
Please be informed that any information we collect from your input, feedback, information about you or information obtained from your parents will be treated as personal information.
How we use information we collect
CyberLink processes personal information on our servers in many countries around the world. We may process your personal information on a server located outside the country where you live. We will ask for your consent before using information for a purpose other than those that are set out in this Privacy Policy.
We may use your personal information when using our website for the following purposes:
create and manage your CyberLink Member account, when you purchase from our store, subscribe to our newsletter or download trial software;
create your CyberLink account, when needed to communicate with you;
verify your identity and entitlement to certain products or services;
process your purchase transactions;
update you on the status of your order;
allow you to register for products or services you purchase on our Website;
manage your subscription plan;
communicate with you should you require technical or customer support service;
subscribe you to newsletter, product updates and upgrades;
connect to you about and manage your participation in contests, offers or promotions;
get your feedback on the trial software;
research, implement product improvements and archive purposes;
target advertisement purposes;
evaluate and improve quality of our products, services and websites;
provide you with a customized experience when you use our service or visit our website;
use your Internet protocol (IP) address to collect anonymous, aggregate statistics: to help diagnose problems with our server, to administer our service, to help identify you and your activities on the Website (such as registering for an account, uploading/downloading video effects or templates, voting other members’ effects, connecting with other members, forming groups, participating in forum discussions, and purchasing products and services) to gather broad demographic information to analyze traffic to this service in order to understand our visitors’ needs, providing interesting data to our web visitors and to continually improve our Website for them;
marketing purposes;
promotional collaboration with business partners; and
to assist you in finding and communicating with your friends when you use your Facebook account to login into our Website*.
*By using your Facebook login information to log into the Website, Mobile Apps or Computer Software you also permit the Website to access your Facebook information, such as your profile information and privacy settings. Your user profile information including members' pictures and user names, where applicable, are displayed on the Website and Mobile App in order to facilitate user interaction in the social network community. Email addresses are used to send notifications related to the Website and its associated services without disclosing their email addresses. Your full name will never directly reveal to other members unless it is chosen as their profile name/ avatar.
Information we share
We do not share personal information with companies, organizations and individuals outside of CyberLink unless one of the following circumstances applies:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of CyberLink when we have your consent. For example, in order to create your forum account, we will share your user name, user email, user id, and user avatar from your
CyberLink membership account
with
third-party service provider
.
For external processing and customer/technical support
We provide personal information to our affiliates or partners to process on our behalf based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures or provide necessary customer and technical support in response to customer’s feedback. In addition, we may share your personal information with our current third party service providers that enable us to fulfill the purposes in the preceding paragraph.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of CyberLink if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues.
protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of CyberLink, our users or the public as required or permitted by law.
Information retention
We take every reasonable step to ensure that your information are only processed for the minimum period necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. The criteria for determining the duration for which we will retain your information are as follows:
(1) we will retain information in a form that permits identification only for as long as:
we maintain an ongoing relationship with you (e.g., where you are an active user who logs in to our services within past two (2) years, or you are lawfully included in our mailing list and have not unsubscribed); or
b. your information are necessary in connection with the lawful purposes set out in this Privacy Policy, for which we have a valid legal basis (e.g., where your information are included in a contract between us and your employer, and we have a legitimate interest in processing those information for the purposes of operating our business and fulfilling our obligations under that contract; or where we have a legal obligation to retain your information),
plus:
(2) the duration of:
any applicable limitation period under applicable law (i.e., any period during which any person could bring a legal claim against us in connection with your information, or to which your information are relevant); and
an additional two (2) month period following the end of such applicable limitation period (so that, if a person brings a claim at the end of the limitation period, we are still afforded a reasonable amount of time in which to identify any information that are relevant to that claim),
and:
(3) in addition, if any relevant legal claims are brought, we continue to process information for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
During the periods noted in paragraphs (2)a and (2)b above, we will restrict our processing of your information to
                    storage of, and maintaining the security of, those data, except to the extent that those data need to be reviewed in
                    connection with any legal claim, or any obligation under applicable law.
Once the periods in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) above, each to the extent applicable, have concluded, we will
                    either:
permanently delete or destroy the relevant information; or
anonymize the relevant information.
Third Party Services
When you use our services, you may have access to services provided by third-party service providers. Please read the
                    following sections for certain usage restrictions.
For usage of YouTube API services , you agree to be bound by YouTube API Services Terms of Service (
https://developers.google.com/youtube/terms/api-services-terms-of-service
and
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
)
For usage of Google services, you agree to be bound by Google Privacy Policy (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
) and Google's security
                        settings (
https://security.google.com/settings/security/permissions
)
For usage of TikTok services, you agree to be bound by TikTok Privacy Policy (
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/row/privacy-policy/en
)
                        and Terms of Service (
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/row/terms-of-service/en
)
Children's guidelines
CyberLink is committed to protecting the privacy needs of children and we encourage parents and guardians to take an
                    active role in their children’s online activities. The Website is not intended for children under 16 years of
                    age (or the applicable age in their country), and by the Website’s terms of service, users affirm that they
                    are
                    at least 16 years old. We do not
                    knowingly collect or use any online contact information or identifiable off-line contact information about a child
                    without parental consent. We do not knowingly distribute personally identifiable information about children without
                    parental consent. We do not knowingly give children the ability to post or distribute personal information without
                    parental consent. We do not entice children with children-targeted games or contests that would encourage them to
                    disclose personal information.
Your Californian Privacy Right
If you are a resident of California, the following sections are intended to provide you with information as required
                    by California Consumer Privacy Act of 2014 and California Privacy Right Act of 2023. Following sections apply to
                    Personal Information defined in "Personal Information we collect". You may contact us and request the
                    general list of Personal Information shared and the companies among which it is shared. This request may be sent
                    electronically by email to
privacy@cyberlink.com
or by toll
                    free phone at (+1) 888-226-6030. We will respond to these requests for the list within 30 days. Written requests may
                    be sent to 15F., No.100, Minquan Rd., Xindian Dist., New Taipei City 231, Taiwan (R.O.C.)_Attn: Privacy Team.
                    Requests for this information that come to us through other channels may result in a delayed response.
Right to know and Right to access.
We will provide following information upon your request, where
                    relevant and required by the CCPA and CPRA, types of data we may collect, sources from which data may be collected,
                    the purposes to collect data, the third parties that may receive your personal information, and your personal
                    information if we ever collect it.
Right to opt-out.
We do not sell or share your Personal Information to any third party for a
                    business or commercial purpose under any circumstances. However, you have the right to opt-out of the sale or share
                    of your personal information in we ever notify you that we engage in such activity.
Right to correct inaccurate Personal Information.
If you believe your personal information is not
                    correct you may contact us and provide personal information to replace erroneous data.
Right to Request Deletion of Personal Information.
You have the right to request that we delete any
                    Personal Information that we have collected from them. However, we are not required to comply with a request to
                    delete where it is necessary for us to retain the Personal Information in order to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the Personal Information, provide a good or service that you
                        requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you,
                        or otherwise perform our contract with you.
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute
                        those responsible for such activities.
Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise
                        another right provided for by law.
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.).
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that
                        adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render
                        impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent.
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship
                        with us.
Comply with legal obligations.
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you
                        provided it.
Verifiable consumers' requests to delete, or correct their personal information may be submitted through one of the following methods:
Call us toll free at (+1) 888-226-6030
Or by email at:
privacy@cyberlink.com
Information security
We are committed to protecting your interest when using our services from unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure or destruction of information we hold. In particular:
We encrypt many of our services using, for example, TLS, SHA256, etc.
We review our information collection, storage and processing practices to guard against unauthorized access to systems.
We restrict access to personal information to CyberLink’s employees, contractors and agents on a need to know basis in order to process it for us, and who are subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
International transfer of personal information
Because of the international nature of our business, we transfer personal information within CyberLink Group, and to third parties as noted in this Privacy Policy, in connection with the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. For this reason, we transfer personal information to Japan, US, and Taiwan that may have different laws and data protection compliance requirements to those that apply in the country in which you are located.
Please note that when you transfer any personal information directly to any CyberLink Group entity established outside the jurisdiction in which you are located, we are not responsible for that transfer of personal information. We will nevertheless process such personal information, from the point at which we receive those information, in accordance with the provisions of this Privacy Policy.
When this privacy policy applies
Our Privacy Policy does not apply to services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or websites that may be displayed to you when using our Service. Our Privacy Policy does not cover the information practices of other companies and organizations who advertise our services, and who may use cookies and other technologies to serve and offer relevant ads.
Merger or sale
If CyberLink is involved in a merger, acquisition or asset sale, we will continue to ensure the confidentiality of any personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Changes
Our Privacy Policy may change from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We will post any privacy policy changes on this page and, if the changes are significant, we will provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of privacy policy changes).
General
This Privacy Policy shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of Taiwan without regard to conflict of law principles. You and CyberLink hereby irrevocably consent that any legal action or proceeding arising under or in connection with this Privacy Policy must be submit to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction of arbitration in Taipei, Taiwan for the purpose of arbitrating any dispute. In the event that any provision in this Privacy Policy is held to be invalid or unenforceable, the remaining provisions will remain in full force and effect. The failure of a party to enforce any right or provision of this Privacy Policy will not be deemed a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver, to be effective, must be in writing signed by the waiving party (in the case of CyberLink, by an authorized officer). You may not assign this Agreement (by operation of law or otherwise) without the prior written consent of CyberLink and any prohibited assignment will be null and void. CyberLink may assign this Privacy Policy or any rights hereunder without your consent. You agree that this Privacy Policy and the rules, restrictions and policies contained herein, and CyberLink’s enforcement thereof, are not intended to confer and do not confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than you and CyberLink. This Privacy Policy together with constitute the entire agreement between CyberLink and you with respect to the subject matter hereof. Any notice or other communication to be given hereunder will be in writing and given (a) by CyberLink via email (in each case to the address that you provide), (b) a notice on the service, or (c) by you via email to contact
privacy@cyberlink.com
or to such other addresses as CyberLink may specify in writing. The date of receipt shall be deemed the date on which such notice is transmitted.
YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, BY ENTERING INTO THIS PRIVACY POLICY, YOU WAIVE THE RIGHT TO GO TO COURT OR TO PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION.
Product-specific details:
The following notices explain specific privacy practices with respect to certain CyberLink products and services that you may use:
Website
As a visitor to our Website, you can engage in many activities without providing any personal information. However if you choose to engage in other activities like subscribing to the newsletter or downloading trial software applications, CyberLink may ask you to register to the CyberLink membership program. It is completely optional for you to engage in these activities.
Your information we collect
In any event that you choose to provide us with the information when using our website, we will collect your personal information as below in order to help us manage our relationship with you.
Contact details like first and last name, email address, gender, country and preferred language;
Shipping and billing information including credit card and payment information (if you intend to purchase any products from our Website)；
Your transaction and browsing history;
Information you submitted to us in order to receive technical assistance or during customer service interactions;
Information about your computer or device, including browser type and settings, IP address, cookies and traffic data relating to your internet connection;
CyberLink product performance data and information about how you use our products and services.
Use of your information
We may use your information when using our website for the following purposes：
create and manage your CyberLink Member account, when you purchase from our store, subscribe to our newsletter or download trial software;
create your CyberLink account, when needed to communicate with you;
verify your identity and entitlement to certain products or services;
process your purchase transactions;
update you on the status of your order;
allow you to register for products or services you purchase on our Website;
manage your subscription plan;
communicate with you should you require technical or customer support service;
subscribe you to newsletter, product updates and upgrades;
connect to you about and manage your participation in contests, offers or promotions;
get your feedback on the trial software;
research, implement product improvements and archive purposes;
target advertisement purposes;
evaluate and improve quality of our products, services and websites;
provide you with a customized experience when you use our service or visit our website;
use your Internet protocol (IP) address to collect anonymous, aggregate statistics: to help diagnose problems with our server, to administer our service, to help identify you and your activities on the Website (such as registering for an account, uploading/downloading video effects or templates, voting other members’ effects, connecting with other members, forming groups, participating in forum discussions, and purchasing products and services) to gather broad demographic information to analyze traffic to this service in order to understand our visitors’ needs, providing interesting data to our web visitors and to continually improve our Website for them;
marketing purposes;
promotional collaboration with business partners; and
to assist you in finding and communicating with your friends when you use your Facebook account to login into our Website*.
*By using your Facebook login information to log into the Website, you also permit the Website to access your Facebook information, such as your profile information and privacy settings. Your user profile information including members' pictures and user names, where applicable, are displayed on the Website and Mobile App in order to facilitate user interaction in the social network community. Email addresses are used to send notifications related to the Website and its associated services without disclosing their email addresses. Your full name will never directly reveal to other members unless it is chosen as their profile name/ avatar.
Cookies
We use cookies for several purposes, including:
Sign-in and Authentication.
When you sign into our website using your personal CyberLink account, we store a unique ID number, and the time you signed in, in an encrypted cookie on your device. This cookie allows you to move from page to page within the Website without having to sign in again on each page. You can also save your sign-in information so you do not have to sign in again.
Customized experience.
Provide you with a customized experience when you use our service or visit our website
Analytics.
In order to improve your experiences using our websites and services, we use cookies and other identifiers to gather usage and performance data. We use cookies to see which areas of our websites and which features are popular and to count visits to our websites.
Showing Advertising.
We use cookies to record how many visitors have clicked on an advertisement and to record which advertisements you have seen so you don’t see the same one repeatedly.
Control of cookies
You may set your browser to block all cookies, including cookies associated with our services, or to indicate when a cookie is being set by us. However, it’s important to remember that many of our services may not function properly if your cookies are disabled. For example, we may not remember your language preferences.
You may also control cooking setting by following the steps below:
Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but provide controls that allow you to turn off, block or delete them. For example, in Google Chrome, you can disable the Websites to save and read cookie data by clicking [Settings] > [Advanced] > [Content Settings] > [Cookies]. For settings of cookies in other browsers may be available in each browser's privacy or help documentation.
Please be aware that if you choose to delete cookies, settings and preferences controlled by those cookies, they will be deleted and may need to be recreated.
Accessing and updating your personal information
We want you to be clear about what information we collect and store your information for as long as your account is in use, active or for legitimate purpose in line with our business. We do our best to give you ways to manage your information. You may either:
control who you share information with through our service;
change your Profile name and Profile photo appear in shared endorsements that appear in ads by writing to us or adjust setting in your device or membership account; or
email us at
privacy@cyberlink.com
Contact Webmaster.
More information we collect for CyberLink’s social site. (directorzone.cyberlink.com)
We collect personal interests, self-description uploading/downloading video effects, templates, photos or other materials, voting other members’ effects, connecting/following with other members, messaging with other members, forming groups, participating in forum discussions, and purchasing products and services, movie collections, ratings, DVD region, movie interests and movies watched via PowerDVD to help diagnose problems with our server, to administer our Website, to help identify you and your activities on the Website , to gather broad demographic information to analyze traffic to this Website in order to understand our visitors’ needs, providing interesting data to our web visitors and to continually improve our Website for them.
User profile information including members' pictures and user names are displayed on the Website in order to facilitate user interaction in the CyberLink social websites. Email addresses are used for the purposes of inviting new friends to join CyberLink social websites, to add users to members' friends' networks, and to send notifications related to the services. With the exception of inviting friends, adding friends, and notifications, a user's email address is not shared or displayed to people within a user's personal network. Users within a personal network communicate with each other through the CyberLink social websites services, without disclosing their email addresses. Users' full names are never directly revealed to other members.
Disclose of your information when using our website
When purchasing at our Website
The CyberLink website acts as a gateway for you to purchase our products online. Purchases of CyberLink products that are initiated from the CyberLink website are actually completed on the
asknet Solutions AG secure website
,
cleverbridge secure website
,
2Checkout secure website
,
Digital River secure website
,
Stripe secure website
or any other shopping cart vendors (collectively known as “Shopping Cart Vendors”). In order to complete a purchase transaction, Shopping Cart Vendors must collect personal information from you, including your credit card number. In the event CyberLink switches to another Shopper Cart Vendor, your personal information might be transferred to this Shopping Cart Vendor solely for the purpose of completing your renewal transactions, if any. If you are interested in purchasing CyberLink software through the Shopping Cart Vendors Website, please view the
Privacy Statement of asknet Solutions AG
,
Privacy Policy of cleverbridge
,
Privacy Policy of 2Checkout
,
Privacy Policy of Digital River
and
Privacy Policy of Stripe
. 
                                You can be certain that online purchases made through the Shopping Cart Vendors Website are secure. Numerous other online retailers also sell CyberLink products. However, CyberLink does not directly guarantee the privacy of your personal information when making purchases from other Websites. Please consult the Privacy Policy statements posted on those websites directly.
Third Party Advertisers /Interest-Based Ads
CyberLink allows other companies, called third-party ad servers or ad networks like Google, to display and/or serve
                                advertisements within the Website. These third-party ad servers or ad networks use technology to send, directly to
                                your browser the advertisements and links that appear on the website. They automatically receive your IP address
                                when this happens. They may also use other technologies (such as cookies, or JavaScript) to measure the
                                effectiveness of their advertisements and to personalize the content you see. However, please note that if an
                                advertiser requires CyberLink to show an advertisement to a certain audience (for example, men ages 28 - 40) or
                                audience segment (for example, women in California who viewed certain content) and you respond to that
                                advertisement, the advertiser or ad-server may conclude that you have the characteristics of the audience they are
                                trying to reach. The advertiser may also use information regarding your use of the Website, Mobile App and Computer
                                Software, such as the number of times you viewed an ad (but not any personally identifiable information), to
                                determine which ads to deliver to you. The information will be recorded and anonymized by the Third Party
                                Advertisers by means of a series of non-reversible encoding functions. Where we provide you with interest-based ads
                                on a website other than our own, we do not track your other activities on that website, if you click on our ads, we
                                will know only the domain you came from. You should consult the respective privacy policies of these third-party ad
                                servers or ad networks (see links below) for more information on their practices and for instructions on how to opt
                                out, once you have opted in, of certain practices.
CyberLink's Privacy Policy does not apply to, and we cannot control.
If you do not want us to use your Information in this way, you can simply choose not to give your permission on the
                                websites which we collect your information. Please note that in some regions this may involve un-checking a box. You
                                can also exercise this right at any time by unsubscribing the same.
We implement Google Tag Manager and Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (“Google”),
                                to support Google features such as Display Advertising, Remarketing, Google Display Network Impression Reporting,
                                the DoubleClick Campaign Manager integration, Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting. We use
                                Remarketing with Google Analytics to advertise online, Google uses cookies to inform, optimize and serve ads based
                                on your past visits to our Website, and also to report how our ad impressions, uses of ad services are related to
                                your visits to our Website. Google may show our ads on websites across the internet you use. You can also opt-out
                                from being tracked by the foregoing mentioned Google features for the future by following the instructions shown in
                                the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
the activities of, such other advertisers or
                                websites.
We also use some third party tools for purposes of remarketing and audience signal machine learning, such as Google
                                Ads Customer Match. You may find more details of how Google uses Customer Match data at:
https://support.google.com/google-ads/answer/6334160
.
                                If you do not wish to receive any of the interest-based ads or do not want to have your personal data provided to
                                third party advertisers, you may change the settings of in the ad network service.
The website serves the Ads using Google AdSense at
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/
Third Party Tracking
We use cookies and other similar tracking technologies to collect information about how you access and use our Website, for example, the site from which you came. It helps us to measure the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns. Such Website access and usage data may be sent to and stored in the servers of our third party tracking service providers only in anonymized form.
Mobile app
Please refer to
CyberLink Corporation Privacy Policy for Mobile App
for details about how we collect and process certain information when you access through our Mobile Apps.
Computer software
We also provide our service via our Computer Software (Windows, Mac applications) which are installed on your computers.
Your information we collect
In any event that you choose to provide us with the information when using our Computer Software, we will use Unique User ID (UUID) to uniquely identify your device. This UUID is generated by combining Windows Security ID (SID) on your computer, and a randomly generated large number so as to enable us to identify this computer which has been identified to have installed our Computer Software. You may reset this UUID on your device by closing all CyberLink products on your computer and remove this registry key at “Computer\HKEY_CURRENT_USER\Software\CyberLink\CBE” using Windows Registry Editor.”
Use of your information
We may use your information when using our Computer Software for the following purposes：
CyberLink Product Improvement Program (CPIP):
Collecting and analyzing how our applications are being used helps improve our product design, feature development and bug fixings. The CPIP program collects the way you use features in CyberLink applications, your search input, filenames, file extension names of the files that you input to CyberLink applications. It also includes software application information or device information which doesn’t include personal info such as Software release number, Product Key, UI language, OS version, device vendor, device model name, vendor and model name for specific hardware component (like CPU, GPU), the name of your device. To opt-out CPIP, you can go to settings of each CyberLink application to and uncheck the “I want to participate” in CPIP section.
Product Info Notice (Customized Ads / Patch / Content Pack Information)
To receive latest software patch info or sales offers in CyberLink applications, includes software application information or device information which doesn’t include personal info such as Software release number, Product Key, UI language, OS version, device vendor name. If users opted in to CPIP, then data collected in CPIP would be linked to Customized Ads / Patch / Content Pack to provide more interesting info for users. To opt-out latest product info notice, you can go to settings of each CyberLink application and disable the “Check for product update information”, or “Automatically check for software updates” option
Error Reporting
Error Reporting helps CyberLink to build more robust product by fixing product crash issues. When product crashed, an Error Reporting dialog pops up, debug information will be sent back only when users consent to send them back to CyberLink. The Error Reporting collects only program data and memory dump which does not intended to collect any personal info. If email is provided by the users, users affirm that they agrees that CyberLink may contact users for more information to help CyberLink fix the program crash issues.
Product Registration
When users opt-in to register CyberLink products that they use or purchase, they can find the Product Registration dialog. The dialog may popup during they use the product or can be find in the product About dialogs. When user provided their email, their email will be used to register a CyberLink Account with a randomly generated secured password. Users can reset their password in this website and later access their registered product keys in the member zone of this website. Upon the registration, email address, birthday (if user opt-in to provide) from the user will be collected along with the UUID (mentioned above) and other info that are not unique to this user including: software release number, Product Key, UI language, OS version, device vendor, device model name, vendor and model name for specific hardware component (like CPU, GPU), the name of users’ device.
Codec activation
When you use certain technologies essential to multi-media functions for the first time, the software application will collect the serial number of your computer system and the product key (CD key) for activation purposes only. This data collection takes place only once for each codec features, it won’t collect how often or how many time you use each codec.
Use of CyberLink’s service
When you use CyberLink service in the Computer Software such as CyberLink Cloud and/or
DirectorZone
, we may collect your usage behavior so as to enhance our Computer Software user experiences, you may want to refer to the WEBSITE section of this Privacy Policy.
Disclose of your information when using our computer software
When purchasing at our computer software
Our Computer Software acts as a gateway for you to purchase our products online. Purchases of CyberLink products that are initiated from our Computer Software would be directed to our Website, you may want to refer to the DISCLOSE OF YOUR INFORMATION WHEN USING OUR WEBSITE section of this Privacy Policy to understand how we manage your information with our Shopping Cart Vendors.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://security.google.com/settings/security/permissions:
Sign in
with your Google Account. This account will be available to other Google apps in the browser.
Email or phone
Forgot email?
Type the text you hear or see
Not your computer? Use Guest mode to sign in privately.
Learn more about using Guest mode
Next
Create account
For my personal use
For my child
For work or my business
Sign in with your Google Account. This account will be available to other Google apps in the browser.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/row/privacy-policy/en:
Other regions
Privacy Policy
Last updated: Sep 30, 2024
Welcome to TikTok. This Privacy Policy applies to TikTok services (the “Platform”), which include TikTok apps, websites, software and related services accessed via any platform or device that link to this Privacy Policy. The Platform is provided and controlled by TikTok Pte. Ltd., with its registered address at 1 Raffles Quay, #26-10, South Tower, Singapore 048583 (“TikTok”, “we” or “us”).
We are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, share, and otherwise process the personal information of users, and other individuals in connection with our Platform. If you do not agree with this policy, you should not use the Platform.
What information we collect
We may collect the following information about you:
Information You Provide
Your profile information.
You give us information when you register on the Platform, including your username, password, date of birth (where applicable), email address and/or telephone number, information you disclose in your user profile, and your photograph or profile video.
User content.
We process the content you generate on the Platform, including photographs, audios and videos you upload or create, comments, hashtags, feedback, reviews, and livestreams you make, and the associated metadata, such as when, where, and by whom the content was created (“User Content”). Even if you are not a user, information about you may appear in User Content created or published by users on the Platform. We collect User Content through pre-loading at the time of creation, import, or upload, regardless of whether you choose to save or upload that User Content, in order to recommend audio options and provide other personalized recommendations. If you apply an effect to your User Content, we may collect a version of your User Content that does not include the effect.
Messages.
We collect information you provide when you compose, send, or receive messages through the Platform’s messaging functionalities. They include messages you send or receive through our chat functionality when communicating with merchants who sell goods to you, and your use of virtual assistants when purchasing items through the Platform. That information includes the content of the message and information about the message, such as when it was sent, received, or read, and message participants. Please be aware that messages you choose to send to other users of the Platform will be accessible by those users and that we are not responsible for the manner in which those users use or share the messages.
We may access content, including text, images, and video, found in your device’s
clipboard
, with your permission. For example, if you choose to initiate content sharing with a third-party platform, or choose to paste content from the clipboard into the Platform, we access this information stored in your clipboard in order to fulfill your request.
Purchase information.
When you make a purchase or payment on or through the Platform, including when you buy TikTok Coins or purchase goods through our shopping features, we collect information about the purchase or payment transaction, such as payment card information, billing, delivery, and contact information, and items you purchased.
Your phone and social network contacts.
If you choose to sync your phone contacts, we will access and collect information such as names, phone numbers, and email addresses, and match that information against existing users of the Platform. If you choose to share your social network contacts, we will collect your public profile information as well as names and profiles of your social network contacts.
Proof of your identity or age.
We sometimes ask you to provide proof of identity or age in order to use certain features, such as livestream or verified accounts, or when you apply for a Business Account, ensure that you are old enough to use the Platform, or in other instances where verification may be required.
Information in
correspondence
you send to us, including when you contact us for support or feedback.
Information through surveys, research, promotion, contests, marketing campaigns, challenges, competitions or events conducted or sponsored by us, in which you participate.
Automatically Collected Information
Usage Information.
We collect information regarding your use of the Platform,
e.g.
, how you engage with the Platform, including how you interact with content we show to you, the advertisements you view, videos you watch and problems encountered, browsing and search history, the content you like, the content you save to ‘My Favourites’, the users you follow and how you engage with mutual followers.
Inferred Information.
We also infer your attributes, including your interests, gender and age range for the purpose of personalising content.
Technical Information we collect about you.
We collect certain information about the device you use to access the Platform, such as your IP address, user agent, mobile carrier, time zone settings, identifiers for advertising purposes, model of your device, the device system, network type, device IDs, your screen resolution and operating system, app and file names and types, keystroke patterns or rhythms, battery state, audio settings and connected audio devices. Where you log-in from multiple devices, we will be able to use your profile information to identify your activity across devices. We may also associate you with information collected from devices other than those you use to log-in to the Platform.
Location Information.
We collect information about your approximate location, including location information based on your SIM card and/or IP address. With your permission, we may also collect precise location data (such as GPS). In addition, we collect location information (such as tourist attractions, shops, or other points of interest) if you choose to add location information to your User Content.
Image and Audio Information.
We may collect information about the videos, images and audio that are a part of your User Content, such as identifying the objects and scenery that appear, the existence and location within an image of face and body features and attributes, the nature of the audio, and the text of the words spoken in your User Content. We may collect this information to enable special video effects, for content moderation, for demographic classification, for content and ad recommendations, and for other non-personally-identifying operations.
Cookies.
We and our service providers and business partners use cookies and other similar technologies (e.g., web beacons, flash cookies, etc.) (“Cookies”) to automatically collect information, measure and analyze how you use the Platform, including which pages you view most often and how you interact with content, enhance your experience using the Platform, improve the Platform, provide you with advertising, and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and other content. We and our partners also use Cookies to promote the Platform on other platforms and websites. Cookies enable the Platform to provide certain features and functionality. Web beacons are very small images or small pieces of data embedded in images, also known as “pixel tags” or “clear GIFs,” that can recognize Cookies, the time and date a page is viewed, a description of the page where the pixel tag is placed, and similar information from your computer or device. To learn how to disable certain Cookies, see the “
Your rights and choices
” section below.
Information From Other Sources
We may receive the information described in this Privacy Policy from other sources, such as:
If you choose to register or use the Platform using a third-party social network account details (
e.g.
, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google) or login service, you will provide us or allow to provide us with your username, public profile, and other possible information related to such account. We will likewise share certain information with your social network such as your app ID, access token and the referring URL. If you link your TikTok account to another service, we may receive information about your use of that service.
Advertisers, measurement and other partners share information with us about you and the actions you have taken outside of the Platform, such as your activities on other websites and apps or in stores, including the products or services you purchased, online or in person. These partners also share information with us, such as mobile identifiers for advertising, hashed email addresses and phone numbers, and cookie identifiers, which we use to help match you and your actions outside of the Platform with your TikTok account. Some of our advertisers and other partners enable us to collect similar information directly from their websites or apps by integrating our
TikTok Advertiser Tools
(such as TikTok Pixel).
We may obtain information about you from certain affiliated entities within our corporate group, including about your activities on their platforms.
We may receive information about you from others, including where you are included or mentioned in User Content, direct messages, in a complaint, appeal, request or feedback submitted to us, or if your contact information is provided to us. We may collect information about you from other publicly available sources.
We may receive information from merchants and payment and transaction fulfillment providers about you, such as payment confirmation details, and information about the delivery of products you have purchased through our shopping features.
How we use your information
As explained below, we use your information to improve, support and administer the Platform, to allow you to use its functionalities, and to fulfill and enforce our Terms of Service. We may also use your information to, among other things, personalise content you see on the Platform, promote the Platform, and customize your ad experience. We generally use the information we collect in the following ways:
To fulfill requests for products, services, Platform functionality, support and information for internal operations, including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, statistical, and survey purposes and to solicit your feedback.
To provide our shopping features and facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, including sharing your information with merchants, payment and transaction fulfillment providers, and other service providers in order to process your orders.
To personalise the content you see when you use the Platform. For example, we may provide you with services based on the country settings you have chosen or show you content that is similar to content that you have liked or interacted with.
To send promotional materials, including by instant messaging or email, from us or on behalf of our affiliates and trusted third parties.
To improve and develop our Platform and conduct product development.
To measure and understand the effectiveness of the advertisements and other content we serve to you and others, and to deliver advertising, including targeted advertising, to you on the Platform.
To support the social functions of the Platform, including to permit you and others to connect with each other (for example, through our Find Friends function) and to share whether you are active on the Platform (and other information which you choose to share) with your friends, to provide our messaging service if you choose to use this function, to suggest accounts to you and others, and for you and others to share, download, and otherwise interact with User Content posted through the Platform.
To enable you to participate in the virtual items program.
To allow you to participate in interactive features of the Platform, such as enabling your content to be used in other users’ videos.
To use User Content as part of our advertising and marketing campaigns to promote the Platform, to invite you to participate in an event, and to promote popular topics, hashtags and campaigns on the Platform.
To understand how you use the Platform, including across your devices.
To infer additional information about you, such as your age range, gender, and interests.
To help us detect and combat abuse, harmful activity, fraud, spam, and illegal activity on the Platform.
To ensure content is presented in the most effective manner for you and your device.
To promote the safety, security of the Platform, including by scanning, analyzing, and reviewing User Content, messages and associated metadata for violations of our Terms of Service, Community Guidelines, or other conditions and policies.
To facilitate research conducted by independent researchers that meets certain criteria.
To verify your identity or age.
To communicate with you, including to notify you about changes in our services.
To announce you as a winner of our contests or promotions if permitted by the promotion rule, and to send you any applicable prizes.
To enforce our Terms of Service, Community Guidelines, and other conditions and policies.
Consistent with your permissions, to provide you with location-based services, such as advertising and other personalized content.
To train and improve our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms.
To facilitate and fulfill sales, promotion, and purchases of goods and services and to provide user support.
How we share your information
We share your information with the following parties:
Business Partners
If you choose to register to use the Platform using your social network account details (
e.g.
, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google), you will provide us or allow your social network to provide us with your phone number, email address, username and public profile. We will likewise share certain information with the relevant social network such as your app ID, access token and the referring URL. If you choose to allow a third-party service to access your account, we will share certain information about you with the third party. Depending on the permissions you grant, the third party may be able to obtain your account information and other information you choose to provide.
Where you opt to share content on social media platforms, the video, username and accompanying text will be shared on that platform or, in the case of sharing via instant messaging platforms such as Whatsapp, a link to the content will be shared.
Service Providers
We provide information and content to service providers who support our business, such as cloud service providers and providers of content moderation services to ensure that the Platform is a safe and enjoyable place and service providers that assist us in marketing the Platform.
Payment processors and transaction fulfillment providers
: If you choose to buy Coins or conduct other payment related transactions, we will share data with the relevant payment provider to facilitate this transaction. For Coin transactions, we share a transaction ID to enable us to identify you and credit your account with the correct value in coins once you have made the payment.
Analytics providers:
We use analytics providers to help us in the optimisation and improvement of the Platform. Our third-party analytics providers also help us serve targeted advertisements.
Advertisers, Advertising Networks and Measurement Partners
We share information with advertisers and third-party measurement companies to show how many and which users of the Platform have viewed or clicked on an advertisement.
If you use the TikTok Lite version of TikTok, we share information with advertising networks to display personalised advertisements to you on the TikTok Lite app and elsewhere online. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties, and the information practices of these third parties are not covered by this Privacy Policy.
Independent Researchers
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria.
Our Corporate Group
We may also share your information with other members, subsidiaries, or affiliates of our corporate group, including to provide the Platform, to improve and optimise the Platform, to prevent illegal use and to support users.
For Legal Reasons
We will share your information with law enforcement agencies, public authorities or other organisations if legally required to do so, or if such use is reasonably necessary to:
comply with legal obligation, process or request;
enforce our Terms of Service and other agreements, policies, and standards, including investigation of any potential violation thereof;
detect, prevent or otherwise address security, fraud or technical issues; or
protect the rights, property or safety of us, our users, a third party or the public as required or permitted by law (including exchanging information with other companies and organisations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction).
Public Profiles
Please note that if your profile is public, your content will be visible to anyone on the Platform and may also be accessed or shared by your friends and followers as well as third parties such as search engines, content aggregators and news sites. You can change who can see a video each time you upload a video. Alternatively, you can change your profile to default private by changing your settings to 'Private Account' in “Manage my account” settings.
Sale, Merger or Other Business Transactions
We may also disclose your information to third parties:
in the event that we sell or buy any business or assets (whether a result of liquidation, bankruptcy or otherwise), in which case we will disclose your data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets; or
if we sell, buy, merge, are acquired by, or partner with other companies or businesses, or sell some or all of our assets. In such transactions, user information may be among the transferred assets.
Merchants, Payment and Transaction Fulfillment Providers, and Other Service Providers
When you make a purchase through our shopping features, we share the information related to the transaction with the merchant, payment and transaction fulfillment providers, and other service providers. For example, we will share the order items, contact details and delivery information so your order can be processed. These entities may use the information shared in accordance with their privacy policies.
Where we store your information
Your information may be stored on servers located outside the country where you live, such as in Singapore, Malaysia, Ireland and the United States. We maintain major servers around the world to bring you our services globally and continuously.
Your rights and choices
You have rights and choices when it comes to your information. You may be afforded certain rights under applicable laws, which may include the right to access, delete, update, or rectify your data, to be informed of the processing of your data, to file complaints with authorities, and potentially other rights. You may submit a request to exercise your rights under applicable laws at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
. You may appeal any decision we have made about your request by following the instructions in the communication you receive from us notifying you of our decision. Please also see the Supplemental Terms below on whether a local representative or local contact is available for your country.
You can access and edit most of your profile information by signing into TikTok. You can delete the User Content you uploaded. We also provide a number of tools in Settings that allow you to control, among others, who can view your videos, send you messages, or post comments to your videos. Should you choose to do so, you may delete your entire account in Settings.
You may be able to refuse or disable Cookies by adjusting your device browser settings. Because each browser is different, please consult the instructions provided by your browser. Please note that you may need to take additional steps to refuse or disable certain types of Cookies. For example, due to differences in how browsers and mobile apps function, you may need to take different steps to opt out of Cookies used for targeted advertising in a browser and to opt out of targeted advertising for a mobile application, which you may control through your device settings or mobile app permissions. In addition, your opt-out selection is specific to the particular browser or device that you are using when you opt out, so you may need to opt-out separately for each of browser or device. If you choose to refuse, disable, or delete Cookies, some of the functionality of the Platform may no longer be available to you.
The security of your information
We take steps to ensure that your information is treated securely and in accordance with this policy. Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will use reasonable measures to protect your personal data, for example, by encryption, we cannot guarantee the security of your information transmitted via the Platform; any transmission is at your own risk.
We have appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk of varying likelihood and severity for the rights and freedoms of you and other users. We maintain these technical and organizational measures and will amend them from time to time to improve the overall security of our systems.
We will, from time to time, include links to and from the websites of our partner networks, advertisers and affiliates. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please check these policies before you submit any information to these websites.
How long we keep your information
We retain information for as long as necessary to provide the Platform and for the other purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. We also retain information when necessary to comply with contractual and legal obligations, when we have a legitimate business interest to do so (such as improving and developing the Platform, and enhancing its safety, security and stability), and for the exercise or defence of legal claims.
The retention periods are different depending on different criteria, such as the type of information and the purposes for which we use the information. For example, when we process your information such as your profile information to provide you with the Platform, we keep this information for as long as you have an account. If you violate our Terms of Service, Community Guidelines, or other conditions or policies, we may remove your profile and User Content from public view immediately, but may keep other information about you to process the violation.
Information relating to children and teens
TikTok is not directed at children under the age of 13. In certain cases this age may be higher due to local regulatory requirements, please see your local supplemental terms for more information. If you believe that there is a user who is below this minimum age, please contact us at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
If you are a parent or guardian, our
Guardian's Guide
contains information and resources to help you understand the Platform and the tools and controls you can use.
Privacy Policy update
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time. When we update the Privacy Policy, we will notify you by updating the “Last Updated” date at the top of this policy and posting the new Privacy Policy or providing any other notice required by applicable law. Your continued access to or use of the Platform after the date of the updated policy constitutes your acceptance of the updated policy. If you do not agree to the updated policy, you must stop accessing or using the Platform.
Contact
If you have questions, comments, complaints or requests regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
Please also see the supplemental terms below on whether a local representative or local contact is available for your country.
We will endeavour to deal with your request as soon as possible. This is without prejudice to your right to make a complaint with a relevant data protection authority, where applicable.
Supplemental Terms – Jurisdiction-Specific
In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the Supplemental Terms – Jurisdiction-Specific that are relevant to your jurisdiction from which you access or use the services, and the rest of policy, the relevant jurisdictions’ Supplemental Terms – Jurisdiction-Specific will supersede and control.
Argentina
If you are using our services in Argentina, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this Policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Your rights and options
According to Law No. 25,326, Regulatory Decree No. 1558/2001 and the provisions and/or binding resolutions issued by the Agency for Access to Public Information ("AAIP"), you have the following rights with respect to your personal data: access, rectification and deletion regarding data protection. You can exercise your rights by sending your request to
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
free of charge.
We encourage you to contact us if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the AAIP. You can contact AAIP through the site:
https://www.argentina.gob.ar/aaip/datospersonales/derechos
.
Australia
If you are using the Platform in Australia, the following additional terms shall apply.
Certain entities in our corporate group, located outside of Australia, are given limited remote access to your information so that they can provide certain functions, as described in the section on "
How we share your information
". Please see
here
for further information on the countries in which our corporate group entities which receive personal information from Australia are located.
Brazil
If you are using the Platform in Brazil, the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
Exercise of data protection rights.
Brazilian law provides certain rights to individuals with regard to their personal data. Thus, we seek to ensure transparency and access controls in order to allow users to benefit from the mentioned rights.
We will respond and/or fulfill your requests for the exercise of your rights below, according to the applicable law and when applicable, to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law - LGPD:
I. confirmation of whether your data are being processed;
II. access to your data;
III. correction of incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data;
IV. anonymization, blocking or erasure of data;
V. portability of personal data to a third party;
VI. object to the processing of personal data;
VII. information of public and private entities with which we shared data;
VIII. information about the possibility to refuse providing personal data and the respective consequences, when applicable;
IX. withdrawal of your consent.
X. request a review of decisions made solely based on automated processing of personal data affecting your interests, including decisions made to define your personal, professional, consumer or credit profile, or aspects of your personality.
We encourage you to contact us if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Brazilian Data Protection Authority (ANPD).
Verifying your identity
: For your safety and to allow us to make sure that we do not disclose any of your personal data to unauthorized third parties, in order to verify your identity and guarantee the adequate exercise of your rights, we may request specific information and/or documents from you before we can properly respond to a request received concerning your data. All data and documents received from you in the process of responding to your requests will be used for the strict purposes of analyzing your request, authenticating your identity, and finally responding to your request.
Limitations to your rights
: In certain situations, we may have legitimate reasons not to comply with some of your requests. For instance, we may choose not to disclose certain information to you when a disclosure could adversely impact our business whenever there is a risk of violation to our trade secrets or intellectual property rights. In addition, we may refrain from complying with a request for erasure when the maintenance of your data is required for complying with legal or regulatory obligations or when such maintenance is required to protect our rights and interests in case a dispute arises. Whenever this is the case and we are unable to comply with a request you make, we will let you know the reasons why we cannot fulfill your request.
Contact: In case of doubt about your privacy, your rights or how to exercise them, please contact us through the form "Contact". If you have any questions about the processing of your personal data, we would like to clarify them.
DPO: If you wish to reach the TikTok’s Data Protection Officer, contact us at:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/DPO
Access Logs
. We keep your application access logs, under confidentiality, in a controlled and safe environment for at least 6 months, in order to comply with legal obligations.
Language
. The Policy may have been prepared in the English language and in the Portuguese language. If you are a user located in Brazil, you shall refer to the Portuguese version, which shall prevail.
International Transfers. International data transfers are necessary for us to provide our services. If you are located in Brazil, we will always rely on one of the international data transfer mechanisms under applicable data protection laws and regulations.
Canada
If you are using the Platform in Canada, the following additional terms apply.
Information Relating to Children and Teens.
Please note that if you are a resident of the Province of Quebec, you are only permitted to use the Platform if you are at least 14 years old.
Your Rights
. Subject to limited exceptions under applicable law, you have the right to access, update, rectify and correct inaccuracies in your personal information and to withdraw your consent to our collection, use and disclosure of your personal information. To exercise these rights, you may contact us using the contact information set out below. We may require certain personal information for the purpose of verifying the identity of the individual making the request or that they are authorized to act on behalf of another individual in such matters.
Your Choices
. You can unsubscribe from our marketing emails at any time by clicking the “unsubscribe” link included at the bottom of each email we send. You can also adjust your preferences regarding certain types of personalized advertising by using the Ads tools in Settings. For more information about managing your account and privacy settings, please visit our Account and Privacy Settings page at
https://support.tiktok.com/en/account-and-privacy
.
Internal Policies and Access Controls.
We implement and maintain internal policies and technical measures to restrict access to your personal information within our organization. Access to personal information within our organization is limited to employees who need the information to perform their job functions. For example, our customer support team may have access to certain types of information during our interactions with you, such as responding to complaints and inquiries. Similarly, our content moderators may access certain information in order to enforce our Terms of Service, Community Guidelines, and other conditions and policies.
Data Retention Practices.
We have procedures in place to limit the retention periods as set out in the “
How Long We Keep Your Information
” section above. When personal information is no longer needed for these purposes or is no longer required to be retained by law, we take appropriate steps to dispose of it securely in accordance with our internal procedures.
Transfer Outside Your Jurisdiction
. We and our service providers (including members, subsidiaries, or affiliates of our corporate group) may access, store and otherwise process personal information outside of Canada (and, for residents of Quebec, outside of Quebec), including in the United States, Malaysia, Ireland, Singapore, and other foreign jurisdictions where we or our service providers are located. For information about how we or our service providers (including service providers outside Canada) process personal information, please contact us using the contact information set out below. We and our service providers may disclose your personal information if we are required or permitted by applicable law or legal process, which may include lawful access by foreign courts, law enforcement or other government authorities in the jurisdictions in which we or our service providers operate.
Contact
. If you are a resident of Canada, you can contact our Privacy Office at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/Privacy-Office-Canada
Egypt
If you are using our services in Egypt, the following additional terms apply.
You declare that you are over the age of 18. If you are under the age of 18, please have your parent or legal guardian read this with you. If you are reviewing these terms as the parent/legal guardian of a user who is under the age of 18, you hereby declare that such user is above the age of 13 and that you have read and acknowledged TikTok's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use and agree to the use by your child of the Platform and registration for an account.
India
If you are using our services in India, the Platform is provided and controlled by ByteDance (India) Technology Private Limited. TikTok is our brand for providing and promoting the services. When using these services from India, please accordingly read “TikTok”, “we” or “us” in this policy to refer to Bytedance (India) Technology India Private Limited.
Indonesia
If you are using our services in Indonesia, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall apply.
Age, Parental and Guardian Consent.
By accessing and/or using this Platform, you represent that you are at least 21 years of age or married or not under guardianship. If you are below 21 years old and you are not married, or under guardianship:
you must obtain approval from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s); and
your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are responsible for: (i) all your actions in connection with your access to and use of the Platform; (ii) your compliance with this policy; and (iii) ensuring that any of your participation in the Platform will not, in any event, result in any violation of applicable laws and regulations relating to child protections.
If you do not have consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) and your parent(s) or guardian(s) is not willing to open the account under their name, you must cease accessing the Platform.
Your Choices
. You may withdraw your consent to TikTok's disclosure of personal data to third parties. Upon your request, we will cease to display, publish, transmit, disseminate, and/or open the access to your personal data to third parties. Please note that by withdrawing your consent to the disclosure and/or collection of your personal data, we may not be able to fulfill your requests and you may not be able to use some of TikTok features and functionality.
You may request TikTok to (i) disclose the history of personal data that we have collected; and/or (ii) erase and dispose of your personal data that we have collected on our server. Please note that by requesting us to erase and dispose of your personal data, you may not be able to use some of TikTok’s features and functionality.
To exercise any of your rights, contact us at:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
.
Notification.
In the event of any breach of personal data, we will notify you and provide you with information regarding such breach of personal data.
Data retention
. We retain your information for as long as it is necessary to provide you with the service. Where we do not need your information in order to provide the service to you, we retain it only for so long as we have a legitimate business purpose in keeping such data. However, there are occasions where we are likely to keep this data for five (5) years (or longer if required) in accordance with our legal obligations or where it is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
After you have terminated your use of our Platform and the five (5) years retention period has lapsed, we store your information in an aggregated and anonymised format. Non-personally identifiable information may be retained indefinitely for analytics.
Israel
If you are using our services in Israel, the following additional terms apply.
You declare that you are over the age of 18. If you are under the age of 18, please have your parent or legal guardian read this with you. If you are reviewing these terms as the parent/legal guardian of a user who is under the age of 18, you hereby declare that such user is above the age of 13 and that you have read and acknowledged TikTok's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use and agree to the use by your child of the Platform and registration for an account.
Japan
If you are using our services in Japan, the following additional terms and our
Japanese language Privacy Policy
apply:
If you are under the age of 15, please have your parent or legal guardian read this with you. If you do not have consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) and your parent(s) or guardian(s) is not willing to open the account under their name, you must cease accessing the Platform.
If you are reviewing these terms as the parent/legal guardian of a user who is under the age of 15, you hereby declare that such user is above the age of 13 and that you have read and acknowledged TikTok's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use and agree to the use by your child of the Platform and registration for an account, as well as TikTok's processing of your child's personal data in accordance with TikTok's Privacy Policy.
Kenya
If you are using our services in Kenya, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this Policy, the following terms shall prevail.
The legal bases we rely on to process data: We collect and use personal data to offer the Platform as described above. We do so under the lawful basis that the processing is necessary for the performance of a contract in which you are entering or have entered. In some circumstances, we may have to process data for other purposes that are not necessary for the performance of the contract. In such cases, the processing may be based upon (i) our legitimate interests; (ii) compliance with our legal obligations; and/or (iii) consent you may have provided to us.
Age, Parental and Guardian Consent: You declare that you are over the age of 18. If you are below 18 years old:
you must obtain consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s); and
your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) shall be responsible for: (i) all your actions in connection with your access to and use of the Platform; and (ii) your compliance with this Policy.
If you are not at least 18 years of age and you do not have consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) and your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are not willing to open an account under their name(s), you must cease accessing the Platform.
Consequences for Failing to Provide Certain Personal Data: You will be asked to provide certain information (as described above under the ‘What information we collect’ section) before using the Platform or certain functions. Failure to provide all or any part of such information may limit your access to the Platform or some of its features and functionalities.
Mexico
If you are using our services in Mexico, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
How we use your personal data.
Almost all purposes of processing stated in this section of the main Privacy Policy are necessary purposes. However, the following are secondary purposes:
Provide you with personalized advertising.
The above purposes are not necessary for us to provide the Platform but allows us to provide you with a better experience. We offer you the possibility to take decisions regarding how we use and disclose your personal data. You can always limit the secondary purposes of personalised advertising by using the tools in Settings that allow you to limit certain functions.
We use both human and automated means to process your data.
How we share your personal data.
We may share your personal data to a third party for purposes other than processing on behalf of us. We will obtain your consent for such sharing as required by applicable laws.
By providing us with your personal data and using our Platform you agree to the transfers that require your consent. You can always revoke your consent and exercise your rights, as stated below.
Your Rights.
You have the following rights with respect to your personal data: access, rectification, cancellation, opposition, consent withdrawal, limitation to the use and disclosure of your data. You can exercise your rights by sending your request to
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy
. To know more about the applicable requirements and procedure to exercise your rights, contact us to the mentioned email address. If you are under 18 years, you may exercise your rights through a parent or guardian. Your rights requests will be resolved as soon as possible according to the nature of your request.
Information relating to children.
You may review our parental consent section in the Terms of Service.
Philippines
If you are using our services in the Philippines, the following additional terms shall apply pursuant to the relevant laws, rules and regulations and issuances by the Philippines National Privacy Commission (“NPC”) on data privacy.
Your Rights.
To the extent that the relevant laws, rules and regulations on data privacy recognize your rights and freedoms as data subjects, you shall have the right to information, object, access, rectification, erasure or blocking, lodge complaints before the NPC, damages and data portability. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details.
Russia
What are legal grounds for data processing.
When we process your personal data, we rely on the grounds of your consent, performance of a contract, our legitimate interest and obligations to process personal data, or when we are so required by law.
By signing up and using the Platform, you consent to the processing of personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Where we store your personal data.
Your personal data may be transferred from Russia to Singapore and stored in that location, outside of the country where you live.
Public profiles.
We rely on your consent to public distribution of personal data, when your account settings are 'Public Profile'. You can change your profile to private by changing your settings to 'Private Account' in “Manage my account” settings.
Singapore
If you are using our services in Singapore, the following additional terms apply:
Data Protection Officer
: If you wish to reach TikTok’s Data Protection Officer, please contact us at:
Contact the Data Protection Officer | TikTok
South Africa
If you are using our services in South Africa, the following additional terms apply.
You declare that you are over the age of 18. If you are under the age of 18, please have your parent or legal guardian read this with you. If you are reviewing these terms as the parent/legal guardian of a user who is under the age of 18, you hereby declare that such user is above the age of 13 and that you have read and acknowledged TikTok's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use and agree to the use by your child of the Platform and registration for an account.
TikTok's legal entity in South Africa, TikTok South Africa (Pty) Limited (
TikTok SA
), is required by the terms of section 51 of the Promotion of Access to Information Act 2 of 2000 (
PAIA
) to compile an information manual (
PAIA Manual
) that provides details: (i) on its processing of personal information activities in terms of the Protection of Personal Information Act 4 of 2013 (
POPIA
); (ii) the process that must be followed for relevant individuals to exercise their data subject rights as provided for in POPIA; (iii) the records held by TikTok SA in terms of PAIA; and (iv) the process that needs to be followed by relevant individuals to request access to such records in terms of PAIA.
TikTok SA's PAIA Manual can be accessed
here
.
South Korea
If you are using our services in South Korea, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
How we share your personal data
. In addition to the main text of this policy, in the event we use information such as user-generated content and video content on our Platform as part of our advertising and marketing campaigns to promote the Platform, your personal data contained in such information may be disclosed to the recipients of such advertising or marketing content.
Customized Ads
. We may from time to time provide customized ads on our Platform to provide you our Platform for free.
Data retention
. We destroy personal data whose purpose of collection as consented to by you have been achieved, or whose periods of and use to which you consented to or which were provided in this privacy policy have expired; provided, however, we will continue to store your personal data for the following statutorily-prescribed periods, where applicable, including, but not limited to:
Act on Consumer Protection in Electronic Commerce
. Records on your cancellation of an order, your payment on a purchased item, and our supply of a good/service: 5 years; Records on the handling of consumer complaints or disputes: 3 years; Records on advertisements and labels: 6 months.
Protection of Communications Secrets Act
. Records on your visits to our website: 3 months
Destruction of Personal data
. We destroy your personal data in a manner that renders it unrestorable by the relevant department.
Data rights
. You have the right to access personal data we hold about you, to rectify any personal data held about you that is inaccurate, to request the deletion of personal data held about you, and the right to request the suspension of the processing of your personal data. You can exercise your rights by contacting us at
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/report/privacy.
Data Security
. We work hard to protect TikTok and our users from unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure or destruction of information we hold. To this end, we have in place technical, managerial and physical safeguards, including internal policy for data protection, limiting the access to personal data on a need-to-know basis and controlling access to the facilities where personal data is processed.
Information Relating to Children
. TikTok is not directed at children under the age of 14.
Entrustment and/or Overseas Transfer of Personal Data.
To provide you with our Services, we directly collect and process your personal data overseas in Singapore. We entrust your data to our affiliates, cloud storage providers and IT service providers, some of whom are located abroad (
See the Addendum to the Privacy Policy (South Korea)
) subject to your consents or notifications to you, if applicable. Where appropriate, we ensure that such entities which receive and process your data are subject to contractual obligations to store and use personal data in compliance with applicable domestic and international regulations and take appropriate physical and technical measures to protect personal data. You may opt-out of such transfer by contacting us
here
, provided that, you may be restricted from the use of certain Services if you refuse to such transfer.
Local representative pursuant to the Personal Information Protection Act. Please send your inquiries concerning privacy issues in South Korea to our local representative pursuant to the Personal Information Protection Act. Contact details are as follows.
Bae, Kim and Lee LLC
Representative: Soonik Kwon
Address: Tower B, Centropolis, 26 Ujeongguk-ro
Jongno-gu, Seoul 03161, Korea
Phone: +82-2-3404-0108
Email: privacytiktok@bkl.co.kr
Local representative pursuant to the Act on Promotion of Information and Communications Network Utilization and Information Protection, Etc.
Bae, Kim and Lee LLC
Representative: Soonik Kwon
Address: Tower B, Centropolis, 26 Ujeongguk-ro
Jongno-gu, Seoul 03161, Korea
Phone: +82-2-3404-0108
Email: tiktok.kr.itnetwork@bkl.co.kr
Türkiye
If you are using our services in Türkiye, please refer to the
Turkish language Privacy Policy
for further information on our compliance with Law No. 6698 on the Protection of Personal Data.
United Arab Emirates
If you are using the Platform in the United Arab Emirates (“UAE”), the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
How we share your personal data
In addition to the main text of this policy, by using the Platform in the UAE you agree to the terms of this Privacy Policy and consent to our sharing of your personal data in line with the main text of this Privacy Policy.
Governing law and dispute resolution
By using our Platform in the UAE, this Privacy Policy will be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the UAE. In the event of a dispute arising between the parties in connection with this Privacy Policy:
where the dispute relates to a claim for a sum within the limits specified by the DIFC Small Claims Tribunal from time to time, then the dispute shall be referred by either party to the said Tribunal; and
for all other disputes, the parties shall seek settlement of that dispute by mediation in accordance with the Mediation Rules of the DIFC-LCIA Arbitration Centre, which Rules are deemed to be incorporated by reference to this clause. If the dispute is not settled by mediation within 30 days of the commencement of the mediation, or such further period as the parties shall agree in writing, the dispute shall be referred to and finally resolved by arbitration under the Arbitration Rules of the DIFC-LCIA Arbitration Centre, which Rules are deemed to be incorporated by reference to this clause. The language to be used in the mediation and in the arbitration, shall be English. In any arbitration commenced pursuant to this clause the number of arbitrators shall be one and the arbitration shall be conducted in Dubai.
Vietnam
If you are using our services in Vietnam, the following additional terms apply. In the event of any conflict between the following additional terms and the provisions of the main body of this policy, the following terms shall prevail.
Methods of processing your personal data
. We may process your personal data by manual or automated methods.
Data subject's rights and obligations.
Subject to certain exceptions, you have statutory rights and obligations under applicable laws. In particular, you have the following statutory rights:
Right to know;
Right to consent and withdraw consent;
Right to access;
Right to delete data;
Right to restrict data processing;
Right to be provided with data;
Right to object data processing;
Right to complain, denounce or initiate lawsuits;
Right to claim for damages; and
Right to self-protection.
You may exercise these rights by contacting us through the details in the Contact section, and we will respond to your requests regardless of the location in which your data is stored.
You have the following statutory obligations:
Protect your own personal data;
Request other relevant organizations and individuals to protect your personal data;
Respect and protect personal data of others;
Provide complete and accurate personal data upon giving consent to the processing of your personal data; and
Other obligations under applicable laws.
Age, Parental and Guardian Consent.
If you are below 16 years old or under guardianship:
you must obtain approval from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s); and
your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are responsible for: (i) all your actions in connection with your access to and use of the Platform; (ii) your compliance with this policy; and (iii) ensuring that any of your participation in the Platform will not, in any event, result in any violation of applicable laws and regulations relating to child protections.
If you do not have consent from your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) and your parent(s) or legal guardian(s) is not willing to open the account under their name, you must cease accessing the Platform if you are not at least 16 years of age.
Other Jurisdictions
In jurisdictions where the national or official language is not English, the version of the TikTok Privacy Policy in your local language may set out additional terms specific to your jurisdiction. Please also refer to the version of this Privacy Policy in your local language for further information.
Sub-policy 2
https://asknet-solutions.com/legal-and-privacy/privacy-policy.html:
This website stores cookies on your computer. These cookies are used to collect information about how you interact with our website and allow us to remember you. We use this information in order to improve and customize your browsing experience and for analytics and metrics about our visitors both on this website and other media. To find out more about the cookies we use, see our
Privacy Policy
If you decline, your information won’t be tracked when you visit this website. A single cookie will be used in your browser to remember your preference not to be tracked.
Cookies settings
Accept All
Decline All
404 Error
Sorry, the page you were looking for at this URL was not found.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.cleverbridge.com/corporate/privacy-policy/:
Our use of cookies
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts. You can change your preferences at any time by clicking on "Cookie Settings" at the bottom of this page.
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
Your data belongs to you. That's why we want you to know exactly what type of data we collect and what we do with it. When you visit a website, cookies are set to store or retrieve information from your browser. The information collected by these cookies may relate to your preferences, your device, or to making the website work the way you expect it to. Cookies are sometimes set by us and sometimes by third parties whose services are used by cleverbridge. You can learn more about the different categories of cookies we use on this website and choose to enable or disable them in the cookie settings. You can change these settings at any time by clicking on "Cookie Settings" at the bottom of this page. Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 4
https://www.2co.com/privacy.html?MOR=active:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services. For your convenience, you can set your cookie preferences directly below. You consent to our cookies if you click "OK" or continue to use our website.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
2co.com
3
incap_ses_#
Preserves users states across page requests.
nlbi_#
Used to ensure website security and fraud detection.
visid_incap_#
Preserves users states across page requests.
Cookiebot
2
Learn more about this provider
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
CookieConsent
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Google
1
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
aplo-evnt.com
2
GCLB
This cookie is used in context with load balancing - This optimizes the response rate between the visitor and the site, by distributing the traffic load on multiple network links or servers.
X-CSRF-TOKEN
Ensures visitor browsing-security by preventing cross-site request forgery. This cookie is essential for the security of the website and visitor.
apollo.io
1
__cf_bm
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Google
6
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_ga_#
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_gat
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_gid
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
IDE
Pending
collect
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
Marketo
1
Learn more about this provider
_mkto_trk
Contains data on visitor behaviour and website interaction. This is used in context with the email marketing service Marketo.com, which allows the website to target visitors via email.
www.2co.com
1
___utmvc
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
Unclassified
8
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
2Checkout
2
Learn more about this provider
__reff
Pending
__sreff
Pending
Omniconvert
3
Learn more about this provider
_mktz_enabled
Pending
mktz_client
Pending
mktz_sess
Pending
aplo-evnt.com
1
_leadgenie_session
Pending
assets.apollo.io
2
apolloAnonId
Pending
eventQueue
Pending
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/24/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Use necessary cookies only
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all cookies
Legal Policies
Protect Your Business
Privacy Policy
REPER
2CO Notice
REPER
2CO CALIFORNIA
2Checkout takes the protection of Your privacy and personal data very seriously and is committed to ensuring that You continue to trust Us with Your personal data! We want You to understand how We protect Your privacy when We obtain personal data from You, how We use Your personal data, what Your rights are in this respect and how We safeguard it while You use and interact with our services, visit our websites and use its functionalities. For this reason, We are providing You with this Privacy Notice which We kindly ask You to read before You engage with us.
By using our services, You acknowledge that You have read this Privacy Notice and understood that any personal data You provide to us is supplied at Your own free will and shall be used in accordance with the purposes described in this Notice. If You do not understand this Privacy Notice, We recommend You do not use our services.
We reserve the right to change and/or update our Privacy Notice at our discretion and at any time. Where required, You will be notified accordingly and in advance about these changes and or updates, which We kindly ask You to read carefully and make sure You understand. Nevertheless, We advise You to check our Privacy Notice from time to time to ascertain whether any changes took place. For additional details concerning changes to this Privacy Notice, please see Section 18.3 of the 2Checkout Terms and Conditions.
1. About us
Verifone Payments B.V. (formerly known as Avangate B.V.), Avangate Inc., 2Checkout.com Inc or any of their affiliate companies part of the Verifone Payments group doing business as 2Checkout (each "Verifone", "Avangate", "2Checkout", "We," "Us" or "Our") is the Data Controller of Your personal data and will process it in accordance with applicable Data Protection Legislations.
2. Applicability
This Privacy Notice applies to the following individuals with which We envisage to interact in the course of our business:
Merchants, their legal representatives, ultimate beneficial owners and authorised representatives;
Shoppers/End-users/customers/payees of merchants involved in any transaction with our payment institution;
Partners and Affiliates; and
Visitors of our website.
3. Personal data collected and purposes of processing
As used in this Privacy Notice, 'personal data' means any information that can be used to individually identify You, directly or indirectly, alone or along with other information. The categories and volume of personal data that We collect vary depending on: i) the identified relationship We have with You; and ii) our purposes for processing Your personal data.
You can decide at any time not to provide us with the requested personal data. However if You refuse, You may not be able to make purchases, enlist services or access certain options on the Website or through other means.
2Checkout collects personal data to set up and manage accounts for our ecommerce services and to handle orders of goods and services from 2CO. In specific cases, personal data about You is collected by Us automatically. We may collect personal data about You via automated means (such as cookies) when You interact with our ads, apps, or visit Our Websites. In such a case, personal data We collect may include IP address, browser type, operating system, mobile device identifier, geographical area, referring URLs. Customarily, the collection of personal data is done in the following manner, but not limited to:
Directly from You through:
manual input and/or intervention from You where We ask You for information that includes Your personal data; and/or
automatically generated through Your interaction with our services and/or website.
Indirectly about You through:
publicly available sources; and/or
third parties.
We will interact with You (a) online, (b) offline or (c) when You interact with online targeted content (such as advertisements) that We or Our service providers provide to You via third party websites or applications.
You may also provide personal data about others (for example when You place an Order on other's behalf). If so, You are responsible for the entire data You provide to Us (and We assume that You are authorized to give such data). In case the personal data provided by You concerns other persons, it will be Your responsibility to obtain prior authorization.
Depending on Your relationship with us, We collect the following categories of personal data:
A. Merchants and their affiliates or partners
The personal data We collect and process about merchants or their affiliates or partners includes but is not limited to: full name, date of birth, postal address and contact details (e-mail address and phone number); financial and credit card information; nationality and country of residence; information on government-issued identification documents and copies; documents confirming the right of representation; and other personal data that We may need to:
Conduct our due diligence on Your business and conclude a service agreement with You.
Carry out our obligations relating to Your contract and notify You of any changes or updates to our services, terms of service, scheduled maintenance, billing issues, etc.
Comply with our legal obligations on anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing legislation. In such situations, We may use and process personal data about You from publicly available sources, credit reference or fraud prevention agencies or check data against government sanction lists, either directly, or using identity verification providers or due diligence and screening information providers, as necessary to confirm Your identity and prevent fraudulent activities and money laundering.
Comply with any reporting obligations or investigations from government authorities or financial institutions; fulfilling other financial, tax, legal, compliance or administrative functions.
Recover debt and collections; detecting and preventing fraud; detecting and preventing violations of our legal agreements.
Analyse and understand how our services are used based on Your interaction with them for improvement and further development.
Administer our services for internal operations, including security and business continuity, troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
Provide You with personalised offerings of our products and services through emails if You have subscribed to such communications. You may unsubscribe from such personalized offers. You have the right to withdraw Your consent or to object to personalized direct marketing or commercial activities, including profiling related to these activities.
to inform You about Product upgrades; special offers; other products, services and information (including from third parties); market research; or completing surveys or evaluations; if You have opted to receive such communications.
As a general rule, We avoid processing special category personal data. However, where it is required by law, We may process special categories of personal data such as information about race, ethnic origin, politics, biometrics (where used for ID purposes), health data and criminal convictions and offences. When this is the case, We shall only process this information in strict accordance with the law governing this type of information and apply strict security measures.
B. Merchants' shoppers/end-users/customers/payees involved in any transaction with Us
The personal data We collect and process for our shoppers are: name, surname, billing and shipping address, email address, phone number; transaction details, such as information about the Products You buy, bank account information, credit card number and other credit card details; renewal options, geo-location data of Your mobile or other device, including GPS-based, Wi-Fi-based, or cell-based location information and any other data needed to:
Register Your purchase (for warranty, technical support, or other purposes) and facilitate the payment between You and the merchant.
Process an Order from You, including processing Your online payment and notifying You of the Order status.
Invoice You for the products and services You ordered.
Authenticate and validate payments to mitigate and protect against fraudulent activities, for example if You are the victim of identity theft, if Your personal data was disclosed or hacked.
Facilitate payments dispute or chargeback with a financial institution, if You exert Your right of refusal on purchases made or if Your transaction is subject to such situations.
Create and maintain Your 2Checkout myAccount.
Analyse and understand how our services are used based on Your interaction with them for improvement and further development.
Administer our services for internal operations, including security and business continuity, troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
Provide You with shopper and technical support.
Comply with our legal obligations on monitoring fraud, money-laundering and reporting purposes to government authorities or financial institutions.
C. Partners and affiliates
We may need to process the following personal data about You: name, email, phone number, email address, postal address, bank account details for the following purposes:
Promote our services through performance based marketing.
Monitor and report on affiliate performance.
Pay out commission.
Send out direct marketing communications, and other communication if You join our affiliate network.
D. Visitors of our website and services
When You visit our website or contact us, We collect the following information from You: name, contact details, country and cookies. The cookies used on our Website do not collect directly identifiable personal data such as name, address, email address etc. However, certain cookies may collect information about the device used, which, when combined with other information, it becomes personal data and can indirectly identify You.
Cookies allow us to automatically collect information about You and Your online behaviour, as well as Your device (for example Your computer or mobile device) and browser used, in order to ensure proper functioning and security of our website. We may also use this information to collect statistics about the number of unique visits of our website and perform analytics.
The cookies We use are necessary for the well-functioning of our website. You can set Your browser to block, delete previously-stored cookies or alert You about these cookies, but some parts of the site may become inaccessible or will not function properly. For more information on what are cookies and how We use them, please consult our
Cookie Policy
.
4. Legal basis for processing
Our focus is to process Your personal data only for specific purposes that allow Us to service You in the best possible manner, when We have a valid legal basis to do so and as permitted by law as follows:
Performance of Contract – We will process Your data where it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which You are a party or to take steps at Your request before entering into such a contract. As well, if You are a card-holder or alternative payment method user making a payment to a merchant using our services to process Your payment, We may process Your data on the basis of the agreement that We have with the merchant and terms and conditions You agree to.
Compliance with a legal obligation – We will process Your personal data where it is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation that We are subject to. More precisely, We use Your personal data to comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing legislations requirements, fiscal and accounting laws and any other laws applicable to our industry and requests and investigations from relevant authorities and financial institutions.
Legitimate Interest – We will process Your data in our legitimate interest of our business in conducting and managing our business to enable us to give You the best service and the best and most secure experience. We make sure We consider and balance any potential impact on You (both positive and negative) and Your rights before We process Your personal data for our legitimate interests. We do not use Your personal data for activities where our interests are overridden by the impact on You (unless We have Your consent or are otherwise required or permitted to by law). You can obtain further information about how We assess our legitimate interests against any potential impact on You in respect of specific activities by contacting us. Depending on the relationship You have with Us, the processing necessary to fulfil Our legitimate interest may be: to remind You about Your abandoned shopping cart, to request Your feedback, to create and maintain Your 2Checkout myAccounts, to protect against, identify and prevent abuse, fraud and other types of crime, claims and other liabilities. You are entitled to oppose to such processing, and We will review Your request and respond to it on a case by case basis.
Generally, We do not rely on consent as a legal basis for the processing of Your personal data although We will get Your consent before sending direct marketing communications to You via email or text message. You have the right to withdraw Your consent at any time by contacting us.
Some data, such as the types of used services and how many users We receive daily, may be used by 2Checkout for statistical, marketing, promotional, or any other lawful purposes. This kind of information is collected in aggregate/statistical form, without identifying any user individually.
In any case, We will not subject You to a decision based solely on automated processing that produces legal effects concerning You or similarly significantly affects You, unless You explicitly consented to the processing, the processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract between You and Us, or when We are legally required / entitled to use Your personal data in this way, for example to prevent fraud.
5. Children's privacy
You must be older than 16 years in order to place an order with Us if You reside in EU. Otherwise, children's personal data is cautiously processed (only with specific safeguards).
We do not knowingly solicit or collect personal data from children below the age of 16 when offering services of an informational society (except if explicit consent from parent or custodian is obtained in prior). This is applicable only for those residing in EU.
If We discover that accidentally We collected personal data from a child below this age, We will remove that child's personal data from Our records as soon as reasonably possible.
6. Data Sharing
In order to process Your Order, We will share Your personal data with our partners.
Without any prior notice, 2Checkout may share Your personal data with third parties for other purposes, but only in the following circumstances:
Internally: We may share personal data about You across our businesses, with our group of companies to which 2Checkout belongs for the purpose of internal assistance and administrative matters and daily activities in line with this Privacy Notice. In the event of our reorganization, merger or acquisition by another company or in the event of the transfer of our business on the basis of our legitimate interest in consolidating, expanding or streamlining our business, Your personal data might be shared. We will notify You if such instances happen in due course and as soon as possible.
Affiliates: we may provide Your personal data to affiliates or related companies for legitimate business purposes such as performance based marketing.
Merchants and their affiliates or partners: 2Checkout is an ecommerce platform that enables You to access worldwide Products and as such 2Checkout must share Your personal data for the purpose of You processing Your Order.
Service providers: 2Checkout may engage service providers, consultants, external partners, agents or contractors to provide services on its behalf, including administering our media and services available to You. These third parties may come to access or otherwise process Your personal data in the course of providing these services. 2Checkout requires such third parties, to comply with all relevant data protection laws and security requirements in relation to Your personal data, in accordance with their contractual and confidential contractual obligations.
Public Authorities: 2Checkout may disclose Your personal data if it is required to do so by law or if, in Ours good faith judgment, such legal disclosure is reasonably necessary to comply with legal processes, respond to any claims or in relation to our efforts to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding actual or suspected illegal activity, fraud, or other wrongdoing.
Financial institutions: We share personal data with other financial institutions such as banks or other payment service providers to allow payment transaction between a payee and payer. These institutions are independent from our business and processing of Your personal data will be subject to their Privacy Notice and Terms and Conditions.
Some of Our services are provided through sites that bear Our partners' or suppliers' names and trademarks and are not in Our control. These Websites may contain links or other devices that take You to other websites that are also not in Our control. Some of those websites may provide products or services to You directly or on Our behalf. We are not responsible for any aspect of such websites, including, without limitation, the privacy practices, products, services, or content of such websites. This Privacy Notice will not apply to such other websites. Rather, Your activity and the information that You provide at such other websites will be subject to the privacy policy and other terms and conditions posted on such other websites.
7. Your rights
You have specific rights in respect of Your privacy and data protection and We foster an environment facilitating their exercise as follows:
access Your personal data, rectify it, restrict or object to its processing, or request its deletion.
to receive a copy of the personal data You provided to Us or ask us to transmit it to another company.
withdraw any consent You provided.
to opt out of some collection or uses of Your personal data, including the use of cookies and similar technologies, the use of Your personal data for marketing purposes, and the use for data analyses.
where applicable, to lodge a complaint with Your supervisory authority. More information on the local Supervisory Authority can be found here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
We pay the utmost attention to the confidentiality of all personal data and reserve the right to verify Your identity if You submit a request for personal data to avoid a potentially undesirable situation for another person to illegally exercise a right on Your behalf. We may also contact You to ask You for further information in relation to Your request to speed up our response. We will require You to verify Your identity by providing us with identifying information such as Your personal email address, personal telephone number, home address, and/or other information that We can match with the personal data We haves already collected about You to verify Your identity.
You may use an authorized agent to exercise Your rights. We will require Your authorized agent to provide us with either (1) a power of attorney authorizing the authorized agent to act on Your behalf or (2) Your written authorization permitting the authorized agent to request access to Your personal data on Your behalf.  Further, We will require You or Your authorized agent to provide us with identifying information to verify Your identity.  We may also require You to either verify Your own identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that You provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
In accordance with the applicable law, 2Checkout will provide You with access to Your Personal data and, as appropriate, the right to intervene in respect of Your Personal data. You may also be entitled to object to the processing of Your Personal data by 2Checkout or to request the deletion of Your Personal data, in which case, if 2Checkout in its sole discretion deems such Personal data as mandatory, 2Checkout may no longer permit You to engage in certain activities.
You may later choose to unsubscribe from receiving certain types of communications from us by following the unsubscribe directions in Our communications. 2Checkout will endeavor to update Your privacy preferences in 2Checkout's records with Your latest preference in a timely manner.
For Your California Privacy Rights, please visit our 2CO California Privacy Policy
8. Storage Location
If You are residing in the European Union, Your Personal data may be transferred outside the European Union or the European Economic Area.
Personal data provided to 2Checkout by You, the Merchants, or other third parties, is primarily processed and stored on the servers located at Our offices within The Netherlands and/or the United States. We may change the location of the servers from time to time to other countries and without prior notice to You; however, Personal data will continue to be protected in accordance with this Privacy Notice.
Where such recipients of data are located in third countries that do not provide an adequate level of protection or for which the European Commission has not issued an adequacy decision, 2Checkout has in place contractual relationships with each such recipient that include international data transfer agreements and standard contractual clauses as approved by the European Commission or other supervisory authority where required, intended to ensure an adequate level of protection. We will always conduct rigorous due diligence to ensure there are no risks to such transfers and Your personal data is protected and secured.
We participate in the United States - European Union Privacy Shield and Swiss - United States Privacy Shield Frameworks. Please see Our Privacy Shield Policy. We are currently monitoring changes in this area and ensure We adhere to and implement any new measures as required.
9. Data Retention and Security
We installed adequate safeguards to secure Your personal data and We also implemented specific time periods so that to ensure that Your data is not retained longer than necessary for the stated purpose.
Data Retention
. We will only retain Your personal data for as long as You continue to use the Website or Products, and thereafter as permitted or required by applicable law, also taking into account our need to answer queries or resolve problems, provide improved and new services, and comply with legal requirements under applicable laws. This means that We may retain Your personal data for a reasonable period after Your last interaction with us or after the termination of business relationship with us  (as required by anti-money laundering/counter terrorism financing legislation and fiscal law) otherwise no longer than what is necessary to comply with our legal obligations and protect our legitimate interests to defend against a claim.
When the personal data that We collect is no longer required in this way, We anonymize or delete it in a secure manner.
Data security
. 2Checkout has implemented industry-standard measures to protect the security of the Personal data We collect via the Website. For example, We use (SSL - Secure Socket Layers), a firewall and a digital certificate issued by VerisignTM to protect certain of Your Personal data, and We are PCI DSS (Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard) certified. No one can guarantee, and We do not guarantee, that Your Personal data is completely secure at all times, however We ensure You that the security of Your personal data is Our primary concern. You are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of Your Personal data to protect it against unauthorized access or use.
10. Contact us
We have a dedicated Data Protection Officer for You to contact in any privacy matters:
dpo@2checkout.com
.
For the purpose of exercising Your rights, You shall submit a written request to 2Checkout in accordance with the applicable law to the applicable 2Checkout office identified in the "Contact Us" section of the Website, as per the dedicated contact details to
dpo@2checkout.com
.
In addition, if You believe that 2Checkout has not complied with this Privacy Notice with respect to Your Personal data, please submit a sufficiently detailed complaint to
info@2checkout.com
, or by mail to the applicable 2Checkout office identified in the "Contact Us" section of the Website. We will promptly investigate Your complaint. Thereafter, We will take all measures We deem necessary to remedy the issues outlined in Your complaint that We, in Our sole discretion, view as justified.
All Your options and messages will be responded based on applicable legal requirements (one month since Your request or longer if necessary). Nevertheless, please consider that in order to implement Your requests or options We may need several days due to technical reasons (during such period We may continue to process Your personal data based on Your past options).
If You have any questions about this Privacy Notice, please send Your inquiry to
info@2checkout.com
, or to the applicable office identified in the "Contact Us" section of the Website.
Last updated: February,28 2023
1. Purpose and intent
Verifone Payments B.V. (formerly known as Avangate B.V.), Avangate Inc., 2Checkout.com Inc or any of their affiliate companies part of the Verifone Payments group doing business as 2Checkout (collectively, “the Company”) are committed to protecting the privacy and security of your personal information.  This California privacy policy describes how we collect, use, retain, secure and disclose personal information about you (our “Information Practices”).  This privacy policy is in addition to our main Privacy Notice located at:  https://www.2checkout.com/legal/privacy/ and is intended to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act, California Privacy Rights Act, and applicable regulations (together the “CPRA”).
It is important that you understand this California privacy policy, together with any other privacy notices we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal information about you, so that you are aware of how and why we are using such information. If you have any questions about this privacy policy or our Information Practices, please contact us at:
dpo@2checkout.com
.
If you wish to access this California privacy policy in an alternate format or require an accommodation to access this privacy policy, please contact us at:
dpo@2checkout.com
.
2. Data protection principles
We collect, use, retain, and share your personal information in accordance with certain data privacy and data protection principles. Specifically, the personal information we collect about you is:
used lawfully, fairly and in a transparent way;
collected only for valid purposes that we have clearly explained to you and not used in any way that is incompatible with those purposes;
reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve these purposes;
accurate and kept up to date;
kept only as long as necessary for these purposes; and
kept securely.
If we intend to collect, use, retain, or share your personal information for any purpose that is incompatible with the purposes for which your personal information was collected, we will obtain your consent to do so.
For the purposes of this privacy policy, “personal information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
3. Personal information we collect and how we collect it, use it, and retain it
We collect, receive, use and retain personal information for the following purposes.
However, we do not
:
sell your personal information;
share or disclose your personal information to third parties other than the entities or service providers listed below;
share or disclose your sensitive information to third parties for purposes other than those listed below or otherwise permitted by the CPRA;
sell or share the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age; or
permit third parties to collect your personal information on our behalf other than our service providers listed below.
The categories of Personal Information we have collected during the previous twelve months include:
Identifiers
such as name, address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, internet protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, such as browsing history, search history, and information regarding yours interaction with an internet website, social media site or application
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, or similar information
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Inferences drawn from the personal information collected
You, analytics tools, and our service providers and business partners.
You, analytics tools, and IT service providers
You, our recording device
You, analytics tools, and our service providers.
You, analytics tools, and our service providers
Provide and promote our products and services; manage our business relationship; perform accounting other internal business functions; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights; and other short-term transient use.
Provide and promote our products and services; manage our business relationship; perform accounting other internal business functions; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights; detect security incidents and protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights.
Provide and promote our products and services; quality control; manage our business relationship; perform accounting other internal business functions; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights; and other short-term transient use.
Provide and promote our products and services; manage our business relationship; perform accounting other internal business functions; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights; and other short-term transient use.
Provide and promote our products and services; manage our business relationship; perform accounting other internal business functions; comply with applicable laws; exercise and defend our legal rights; and other short-term transient use.
As long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for the collection. Generally, personal information is retained for the duration of our  relationship with you, plus any legally required record or data retention period and/or any period of time necessary to exercise our legal rights
As long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for the collection. Generally, personal information is retained for the duration of our  relationship with you, plus any legally required record or data retention period and/or any period of time necessary to exercise our legal rights
As long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for the collection. Generally, personal information is retained for the duration of our  relationship with you, plus any legally required record or data retention period and/or any period of time necessary to exercise our legal rights
As long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for the collection. Generally, personal information is retained for the duration of our  relationship with you, plus any legally required record or data retention period and/or any period of time necessary to exercise our legal rights
As long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for the collection. Generally, personal information is retained for the duration of our  relationship with you, plus any legally required record or data retention period and/or any period of time necessary to exercise our legal rights
4. How we share personal information
We may disclose your personal information to the following categories of recipients, including for the business purposes described above:
Our affiliate companies;
Our trusted third-party services providers and partners who assist us in providing our products and services and operating our business;
Competent law enforcement agencies, courts, and government agencies to comply with our legal obligations and exercise our legal rights;
Appropriate entities in connection with any proposed purchase, merger, or acquisition; and
Other persons and entities with your consent to the disclosure.
5. Your privacy rights
As a California resident, you have the following privacy rights regarding your personal information:
The right to know and right to access the personal information we have collected about you, including the categories of personal information; the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected; the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information; the categories of third parties to whom the business discloses personal information; and the specific pieces of personal information the business has collected about the consumer;
The right to delete personal information that we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions;
The right to correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you;
The right of portability, or right to have us transfer your personal information to other persons or entities upon your request; and
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising your of privacy rights.
You can exercise your right to know, delete, or correct your Personal Information by submitting a request via email at:
dpo@2checkout.com
. To protect the security of your personal information, we will require you to verify your identity by providing us with identifying information such as your personal email address, personal telephone number, home address, and/or other information that we can match with the personal information we haves already collected about you to verify your identity.
You may use an authorized agent to exercise your right to know, delete, or correct your Personal Information. We will require your authorized agent to provide us with either (1) a power of attorney authorizing the authorized agent to act on your behalf or (2) your written authorization permitting the authorized agent to request access to your personal information on your behalf.  Further, we will require you or your authorized agent to provide us with identifying information to verify your identity.  We may also require you to either verify your own identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
6. Data security
While no data security system can fully protect personal information from unauthorized data breaches, we have implemented reasonable safeguards and controls, consistent with its legal obligations under California and other local, state and federal laws.  The Company is committed to: (i) seeking to safeguard all personal information that you provide to us; (ii) seeking to ensure that it remains confidential and secure; and (iii) taking all reasonable steps to ensure that personal privacy is respected.  All our data is stored in written or electronic form on our servers and computers and in various physical locations. We maintain physical, electronic and procedural safeguards to protect your personal information from misuse, unauthorized access or disclosure and loss or corruption by computer viruses and other sources of harm. We restrict access to personal information to those staff members of the Company and our services providers who need to know that information for the purposes identified in our privacy policy and privacy notices.
We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected data security breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a suspected breach where we are legally required to do so.
7. Personal information of minors
You must be older than 16 years in order to place an order with Us. Otherwise, children's personal information is cautiously processed (only with specific safeguards).
We do not knowingly solicit or collect personal information from children below the age of 16 when offering services of an informational society (except if explicit consent from parent or custodian is obtained in prior).
If We discover that accidentally We collected personal information from a child below this age, We will remove that child's personal information from Our records as soon as reasonably possible.
8. Changes to this privacy policy
As we strive to improve our practices, we may revise the Company’s privacy policy from time to time. This privacy policy is not a contract and we reserve the right to change this policy at any time and to notify you of those changes by posting an updated version of this policy. It is your responsibility to check this policy from time to time for any changes.
This privacy policy was last updated on February 9, 2023.
9. Questions and further information
If you have any questions or would like further information regarding this privacy policy or our privacy practices, please contact us at:
dpo@2checkout.com
.
Last update: February,28 2023
Sub-policy 5
https://store.digitalriver.com/store/defaults/en_US/DisplayDRPrivacyPolicyPage:
Effective:
September 13, 2021
Digital River’s Commitment to Privacy
Digital River, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively “Digital River”, “we”, and “us”) is a world-class online global reseller services provider. We provide essential compliance, fraud, tax and payment services to the supplier or manufacturer (“Supplier”) whose name appears on the website or commerce solution where this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) appears (“Site”). When we make products and service rights (“services”) available for sale through the Site, we do so as an authorized reseller on behalf of our Supplier.
We are committed to earning and keeping your trust, while giving you control over the information that is personal to you. Being accountable to you is a responsibility we take seriously. Our commitment to privacy, including processing and protecting personal data, is demonstrated in this privacy policy ("Privacy Policy").
This Privacy Policy applies to our processing of personal information collected from the Site where this Privacy Policy appears.  This Privacy Policy does not apply to our Supplier’s use of information nor does it apply to information collected by other third parties.  Please carefully review each privacy policy posted on each Site you visit.
Contents
Contents
Key Terms
Information We Collect
Our Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
How We Protect Your Information
Your Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
Data Retention Policy
Do Not Track Requests
Children's Privacy Policy
Failure to Provide Personal Data or Grant Consent When Requested
Data Controller
Automated Processing
Privacy Policy for European Residents
Privacy Policy for California Residents
Privacy Policy for Brazilian Residents
Privacy Policy for South Korea Residents
Notice to Japan Residents
Changes to This Privacy Policy
Grievance Officer/Data Protection Officer
How to Contact Us
Key Terms
The following key terms shall be used in this Privacy Policy:
Aggregated Data:
Data that is consolidated and presented in a summarized manner, not by individual.
Anonymous Information:
Information that has undergone anonymization such that it can no longer be used to identify an individual and cannot be combined with other information to re-identify an individual.
Data Controller:
The natural person or legal entity which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose for which data is used and the means of the processing of Personal Data.
De-identified Data:
Data where certain identifiers are removed to prevent a person's identity from being directly connected with the information (such as masking certain personal identifiers).
Personal Data:
Any information relating to or regarding an identified or identifiable natural person or information that can be used to identify you (or your household), either alone or in combination with other information available to us. This may include your name, shipping and billing address, e-mail address, phone number, identification number (where applicable), date of birth (where applicable), time and location data, bank account information, transaction and payment records, delivery records and other information associated with your account.
i
Special Categories of Data:
Categories of Personal Data that require a heightened level of protection under data protection legislation in some jurisdictions because it reveals or concerns sensitive information, such as health matters, race, or ethnic origin.
Standard Contractual Clauses:
Any set of contractual clauses, approved by the European Commission, for the transfer of personal data to processors established in a third country (outside of the EU/EEA) where that third country does not ensure an adequate level of protection.
Supervisory Authority:
Supervisory Authority (or its equivalent under any data protection legislation) is the independent public authority to whom consumers may lodge a complaint.
Information We Collect
When you place an order from or otherwise use the Site, we collect the following types of information:
Information You Manually Provide
In the process of placing an order on the Site, you provide information required to complete your transaction, validate your identity, confirm compliance with regulations related to the purchase, and to complete the transaction. This may include information such as address, credit card data, or stored wallet billing information. This information is provided to us under the conditions established under this Privacy Policy and the privacy policy of our Supplier. In addition to transactional information, you may provide additional information when seeking support for your purchase or other services from us, such as when you use customer service or download or register products. We may also collect information you provide us if you enter a contest or promotion, or sign-up to receive newsletters or related services.  We may also collect information when you apply for a job opening or otherwise submit employment data to us.
Special Categories of Data
Generally, we do not collect or process Special Categories of Data. However, there could be a situation (such as for employment purposes) where we may process such data. In this case, we will be sure to comply with applicable data protection legislation, including relying on the necessary legal grounds to process the data (e.g., processing health data for an insurance contract). We shall use reasonable security practices and procedures to safeguard your Special Categories of Data.
Information from Your Browser or Device
We may also receive information from your web browser. This may include information that does not identify you personally (such as the date and time of your visit). The information we receive depends on the settings on your web browser. Unless prohibited by law, creating a user identity during a visit to the Site constitutes your consent to processing your Personal Data, and we may link the information your browser provides to information that identifies you personally, as described below. Please consult your browser’s help function to learn how to change the settings. We may also collect limited Personal Data (e-mail address) through web technologies in connection with your use of the Site, as described below.
Geolocation Information
When you use a smart phone, mobile device or computer to access the Site or use our mobile application, we may collect information about your physical location. We may combine this information with other location-based information (e.g., your IP address and billing/postal code), to provide you with other services on your mobile device. We share your location information only with third parties that help us provide you with services. You can opt out of sharing this information by changing the permissions in your mobile device.
Cookies and Other Similar Technologies
The information we collect using cookies and similar technologies is not typically personally identifiable, but we may link it to Personal Data that you provide. We use cookies and other similar technologies to collect information and support certain features of the Site. As the Internet evolves, we may use different types of technologies for this purpose. For example, we may use these technologies to collect information about how visitors use the Site (such as which pages they visit, links they use). We analyze this information to better understand our visitors' interests, needs and to improve the content and functionality of the Site. We may also use the information to support Site features by not asking you to re-enter information we already possess. We also use this information to personalize your experience when you use the Site and to improve marketing efforts, including through use of targeted advertising.
If you do not wish to receive cookies, you may set your browser to reject cookies or to alert you when a cookie is placed on your computer. Although you are not required to accept cookies, you may be unable to use all the Site functionality if your browser rejects our cookies.
For more about our use of cookies and similar technologies, see our
cookies statement
.
Third-Party Cookies and Other Similar Technologies
Web technologies may also be placed on the Site by third party providers. Also, we or third-party providers may place web technologies on behalf of the Supplier whose branding appears on the Site or its service providers. In this way, our Supplier would be allowed to use the data collected. This information is used to enhance your experience with the Site, for marketing analysis, for targeted and display advertising, and for quality improvement. We may collect your IP address through web technologies.
We and our Suppliers may use third party service providers in connection with the Site, which may include but are not limited to: Alexa Metrics, Google Analytics, Omniture, and ClickTale. These and other service providers may collect information about your visits to websites, your interaction with that website, and the products and services offered by us or our Suppliers. Their collection and use of information are subject to their own privacy policies.
For more information regarding these third-party services and how to opt out, please visit
www.networkadvertising.org/consumer/opt_out.asp
,
www.aboutads.info/choices
, or
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/
(in the EU and UK).
Information from Third Parties
We may also receive certain information about you from third parties, such as through your use of a social network authentication to sign-in to the Site, your use of an authenticated payment method, or through other online data sources, according to the rules of the use and processing of such information established by the respective source. If any Personal Data are freely available or accessible in the public domain, we will not have any obligations to you regarding the same.
Our Lawful Basis for Processing Personal Data
In certain jurisdictions, the processing of your Personal Data is lawful only if it is permitted under data protection legislation. We rely on several legal grounds to ensure that our processing and use of your data is compliant with applicable laws and that we have a lawful basis for processing activities as outlined below:
Performance of a Contract.
By completing a transaction through this Site, you are entering into a contract for the sale of products or services, which is governed by our
Terms of Sale
. We must process your personal information to fulfill our obligations under that contract.
Consent.
By using the Site or otherwise submitting your Personal Data to us, you consent to our collection, use and sharing of your information as described in this Privacy Policy. If you do not consent to this Privacy Policy, please do not use or submit your information through the Site.
Legitimate Interest.
We may process Personal Data where processing is necessary for our (or a third party’s) legitimate interests where those interests are not overridden by the interests or rights and freedoms of the data subject.  We will process your data based on legitimate interest, for reasons such as for fraud screening, payment optimization, and compliance with any applicable regulatory scheme governing the transaction. We may process your Personal Data to market to and contact you or to start a conversation using data collected from public sources. We may also, in compliance with applicable law, process your data based on legitimate interest in the employment context.
Other Lawful Basis.
We may also process your data based on another lawful basis such as where the processing is necessary to comply with legal obligations.
How We Use Your Information
When you visit the Site to complete a transaction, we will use your Personal Data in the following manner:
In Connection with Your Transaction
When you visit the Site to complete a transaction, we must process your data to complete the transaction and to comply with our transactional obligations, including processing necessary to:
ensure security and monitor and prevent fraud;
determine the country where you are located for trade compliance;
process your order and payment, verify your tax status, contest chargebacks, determine your eligibility for a line of credit, or to send you transactional notifications;
provide you with a personalized shopping experience;
register your purchase with the manufacturer or service provider for warranty, technical support or similar purposes;
provide you with keys, access codes or other information necessary to access your purchased products and services;
provide notice of your purchase of a service right to the provider of that service;
where you have consented, establish an account for future purchases;
facilitate the renewal of subscriptions for subscription products or services; and
provide you with an effective experience and support. As allowable by law, this may include contacting you if you start a checkout process to follow-up on the incomplete session or to see if there was a problem with your use of the Site.
Marketing and Related Communications
When you provide Personal Data, we may offer you a choice as to whether you would like to receive further marketing and related communications from us or our Supplier. Where you have consented to receive them in accordance with applicable law, these communications could be in the form of direct mail, e-mail or telephone and will contain information relating to our or our Supplier’s products and services. At any time, you may opt-out of receiving these communications by e-mailing us at
remove@digitalriver.com
, or by following any unsubscribe instructions in e-mail communications.
Except where otherwise required by law, if you give us consent to add your contact information to our Supplier's mailing list and later withdraw this permission, you must contact our Supplier (or follow the unsubscribe instructions in the e-mails from our Supplier) to have your name removed from our Supplier's mailing lists.
Our Use of Anonymous Information
We may use a process called anonymization to make data collected by us Anonymous Information. In this case, all personal data elements, such as name, street address, phone number, email address, and others will be anonymized in accordance with applicable law.  We may use the Anonymous Information to:
perform fraud prevention activities, such as device fingerprinting;
personalize and support your use of the Site and/or the services of our Supplier;
improve the Site, the customer experience, our advertising systems, and our products and services;
identify transactions as originating through an affiliate marketing or referral program;
deliver targeted advertisements on the Site and other commerce solutions;
provide reporting to our current and prospective Suppliers and service providers; and
conduct other historical or statistical research and analysis.
We may also use De-identified Data for the same purposes as described in this section, as well as for related purposes, as allowed by applicable law.
Other Ways We Use Your Personal Data
We may also use your Personal Data:
to verify compliance with applicable laws;
to verify that data we have about you is accurate;
as identified in any supplemental privacy notice posted on the Site;
to contact you if you have requested communication from us; and
for human resources such as to collect your email address if you are applying for a position online.
Joint Use
Digital River may use and jointly share Personal Data with other Digital River entities listed
here
.  The scope of the joint use is explained below.
Consumer data we collect while providing of our global reseller services, such as name, shipping and billing address, e-mail address, phone number, transaction and payment records, delivery records and other information associated with your consumer account;
Human Resource data, such as employee data or prospective employee data; and
Other data we collect when you visit the Site or otherwise utilize our services.
Digital River, Inc., Digital River GmbH, and/or Digital River Ireland Ltd. are responsible for managing Personal Data subject to the joint use.
How We Share Your Information
Digital River will never sell your Personal Data. However, we may share your Personal Data as explained in this section.
We will take reasonable steps to ensure any person or entity receiving Personal Data for the purposes described within this Privacy Policy are obligated to keep the Personal Data secure. If we collect or receive Special Categories of Data and it is necessary for us to transfer that Data to a third party, we will share the details of that entity with you where we are required to do so by applicable law. Our obligations will not apply to information shared with any government entity mandated under law to obtain such information or by an order under law for the time being in force.
External Processing
We utilize other companies, including our corporate affiliates, service providers, and other processors to provide certain services to us (or on our behalf), based on our instructions, and in compliance with appropriate confidentiality and security measures. These service providers provide services globally, including:
providing fraud monitoring or detection services;
hosting or maintaining the Site;
performing data integrity checks;
providing optimization services;
processing credit card payments;
offering you a line of credit;
collecting payments;
fulfilling your order;
delivering advertisements on the Site and third-party websites;
sending mail or e-mail;
providing employment and human resources related services; and/or
providing customer service.
We will not share your Personal Data with our service providers unless it is required for the purposes of our legitimate interests or for fulfilling our obligations to you. These service providers may be contractually required to use any information we share with them only to perform services to us or on our behalf and to protect the confidentiality of your Personal Data. We may also allow these companies to use Anonymous Information for their business purposes. We will not share your Personal Data with our affiliates or unrelated third parties to use for their own marketing purposes without your consent.
With Our Suppliers
We will provide certain Personal Data, Anonymous Information or De-identified Data to our Suppliers to fulfill our obligations to you and to otherwise assist our use as described in the "How We Use Your Information" section, including:
for reporting purposes;
fulfilling your order;
to allow our Supplier or its service provider to register your purchase;
to enable your access to products or services provided by our Supplier or its suppliers;
to facilitate warranty, technical support, or after-sales service;
providing customer service;
to allow our Supplier or its service provider to provide services in connection with the Site (such as customer support or single sign-on functionality);
to allow our Supplier or its service provider to send communications if you have consented to receive them; or
for other similar purposes which are necessary for us to fulfill our obligations to you.
To Comply with Legal Requirements, Prevent Fraud and Crimes
As permitted by applicable law, we may disclose Personal Data about you when we believe disclosure is appropriate to:
comply with a legal requirement;
cooperate with law enforcement or other governmental investigations or report any activities that may be in violation of legal or regulatory requirements;
prevent or investigate a possible crime (such as fraud or identity theft) or breaches (also suspected breaches) of security or of this Privacy Policy;
protect the legal rights or safety of Digital River, our employees, Suppliers, third parties, the general public, or you.
In connection with a Sale, Merger or Related Event
If one of our corporate affiliates or a third party has acquired our business, specific assets or the business of one of our operating divisions (such as part of a sale, merger, reorganization, or similar event), your Personal Data will become owned by that company, unless otherwise provided for by local legislation. In that event, the acquiring company's use of your Personal Data will be subject to the governing Privacy Policy, any applicable supplemental privacy notices, and the privacy preferences you have expressed to Digital River prior to merger.
Aggregated or De-Identified Data
We may use or share information that has been aggregated or de-identified so that it cannot reasonably be used to identify an individual. We may use or share this information in several ways, including for fraud prevention services or for analytical purposes.
How We Protect Your Information
We will process your Personal Data on secure, cloud-based computer servers. Your commerce transaction will be optimally processed in or near the region from which you initiated your session. This means that the processing of your Personal Data will take place in either the United States and/or Ireland.  A copy and/or back-up of your Personal Data may be stored and otherwise processed in our cloud service provider in Ireland in accordance with Digital River’s disaster recovery program.
No method of transmitting or storing data is completely secure, however, we take reasonable steps to provide a level of security appropriate to the sensitivity of the information we collect. We have implemented physical, technical, and administrative security practices and safeguards reasonably designed to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access and disclosure. When we collect or transmit sensitive information such as a financial account number, we use industry standard methods to protect that information as required by applicable laws. Although we use reasonable measures to protect your information, we cannot guarantee the security of information provided over the Internet or stored in our databases. You are also responsible for taking reasonable steps to protect your information against unauthorized disclosure or misuse, for example, by protecting your password and signing off when finished using a shared computer or mobile device. We leverage industry best practices to mitigate potential compromises. If the Personal Data under the custody of Digital River is (or is likely to be) divulged, damaged or lost, we will immediately take remedial measures, inform you, if impacted, in a timely manner and report to the competent government agencies as required by applicable laws.
Your Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
We respect your right to make choices about the ways we collect, use, and share your Personal Data.
Accessing Your Data.
If you would like to review, correct, restrict the processing of, object to direct marketing, or request erasure of your Personal Data, please send us a request using the information in the "How to Contact Us" section of this Privacy Policy.
Editing and Deleting Data.
if there is any error in the Personal Data that you have submitted to us or if you would like to request erasure or deletion of your Personal Data, please contact us using the information in the “How to Contact Us” section of this Privacy Policy and we will take appropriate measures.
Objecting to Data Use.
You have the right to object to our processing of Personal Data for direct marketing purposes. We do not sell your Personal data, nor will we use it for Direct Marketing purposes without your consent.
If you contact us, we may ask you for additional information to verify your identity. We reserve the right to limit or deny your request if you have failed to provide enough information to verify your identity or to satisfy our legal and business requirements as noted in our data retention policy. When we delete your Personal Data or Special Categories of Data, it will be disposed of in a manner that prevents loss, theft, misuse, or unauthorized access in-line with our data retention policy.
You have the right to report to your local Supervisory Authority where you feel as though your rights under data protection legislation have not been appropriately considered. However, before doing so, please contact us directly as we are committed to working with you to help resolve any concerns about your privacy.
Data Retention Policy
Digital River may retain your Personal Data and transactional data for as long as you continue to use the Site, and thereafter as permitted or required by applicable law or to satisfy our business requirements.
Do Not Track Requests
If you opt-out of having your information collected through cookies and other web technologies, your existing display advertising cookie(s) will be deleted and a new cookie will attempt to be placed that instructs service providers not to track your future activities when that cookie is detected (a "no-track" cookie). If your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit our opt-out page, a "no-track" cookie cannot be set on your computer. Also, if you subsequently erase "no-track" cookies, use a different computer or change web browsers, you will need to opt out again. We currently do not respond to browser "no-track" signals.
Children's PrivacyChildren's Privacy Policy
Digital River’s services are not directed at nor targeted to children. If you have not reached the age of majority or are not able to enter into legally binding agreements in your country, you may not use the Site unless necessary parental consent has been obtained. If you believe that we have received information from a person protected under child protection laws where necessary parental consent was not obtained, please notify us immediately, and we will take reasonable steps to securely remove that information.
Failure to Provide Personal Data or Grant Consent When Requested
Where we are required to collect Personal Data under the law or in order to perform our contract with you and you fail to provide us with that data when requested, we may not be able to perform our contract with you. Consequently, we may not be able to provide you with the products and/or services you requested.  For example, if you fail to provide your address information or if you fail to check the box agreeing to our Terms of Sale and Privacy Policy, we may not be able to complete your order.
Data Controller
All Personal Data collected by visiting the Site is controlled by Digital River, Inc., 10380 Bren Road West, Minnetonka, Minnesota 55343, USA. However, where, another Digital River entity is the global reseller service provider, as identified during the transaction, that entity is the Data Controller for any Personal Data provided to or collected during the transaction:
Digital River Australia Pty Ltd.
Richard Clayton, 8 Denison Street
South Hobart, Tasmania, AU 7004 Australia
Digital River Do Brasil Importação e Comércio de Produtos de Informática Ltda
Av. Roque Petroni Jr, 1089 - conj. 905 - sala 1
Sao Paulo-SP  Brazil
CEP: 04707-900
Digital River GmbH
Scheidtweiler Strasse 4
Cologne, DE 50933 Germany
Digital River Hong Kong
Unit 908-915, Level 9, Core F, Room 25, Cyberport 3
100 Cyberport Road, HK Hong Kong
Digital River India Private Ltd.
1302, Tower-3, Indiabulls Finance Centre Senapati Bapat Marg, Elphinstone Road
Mumbai Maharashtra 400013 India
Digital River Ireland Ltd.
3rd Floor Kilmore House
Park Lane
Spencer Dock
Dublin 1
Ireland D01 XN99
Digital River Japan K.K.
Tokyo Club Building 11F 3-2-6 Kasumigaseki Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo 100-0013 Japan
Digital River Korea, Limited
4 Floor 92, Hangang daero Yongsan-gu
(Hangang ro 2 ga, LS Yongsan Tower), Seoul,  Republic of Korea
Digital River Mexico, S. de R.L. de C.V.
Avenida Presidente Masaryk 111, Piso 1 Polanco V Seccion, Miguel Hidalgo
Ciudad de Mexico Mexico
Digital River Singapore Pte. Ltd.
35th Floor UOB Plaza 1
80 Raffles Place
Singapore, SG 048624
Digital River Trading (Shanghai) Co., Ltd. AKA China
Suite 1710 Building A, No. 331, North Caoxi Road
Xuhui District Shanghai 200030 China
Digital River UK Ltd
13th floor
One Angel Court
London
EC2R 7HJ
United Kingdom
DR APAC, LLC., Taiwan Branch
23F, 105, Sec.2 Tun Hwa S. Rd.
Taipei 106 Taiwan, Province Of China
DR globalTech, Inc.
10380 Bren Road West
Minnetonka, MN 55343
DigRiv North America, Inc.
10380 Bren Road West
Minnetonka, MN 55343
DigRiv Brasil Ltda
Av. Roque Petroni Jr, 1089 - conj. 905 - sala 3
Sao Paulo-SP  Brazil
CEP: 04707-900
DigRiv Ireland, Ltd
3rd Floor, Kilmore House, Park Lane, Spencer Dock
Dublin 1, Ireland
DigRiv UK Ltd
13th floor
One Angel Court
London
EC2R 7HJ
United Kingdom
Automated Processing
In limited situations, we may use your Personal Data to help us make automated decisions to further improve our business. For example, where you have (if applicable) given consent in the context of marketing, we could use data to segment and target users with personalized messages, or we may use a job title to determine the user’s persona and alter the content accordingly. We may also use that users' geographic location and company data. In some circumstances, for account-based marketing, this could include "likes" that we find in the public domain.
We rely on automated processing in our fraud monitoring tools to help us reduce the amount of manual review necessary to review orders for fraud. We could also rely on automated processing in the context of employment and to ensure our employees are adhering to our internal security policies. You have the right to avoid any decisions based on automated data processing where they can be characterized as profiling. However, we will not be able to process your transaction without using our fraud monitoring tools.
Privacy Policy for European Residents
If you are located in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), or Switzerland, any transfer of your Personal Data outside of that area is protected under Standard Contractual Clauses, or other appropriate data protection safeguards. Your Personal Data may be transferred to Digital River, Inc.'s cloud-based servers in the United States and the processing of your Personal Data in the United States. Your Personal Data may also be transmitted by us to other Digital River entities for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy, for company administration purposes, and to other third-party data processors. For details of the transmission of your Personal Data to other Digital River entities, please see the "Joint Use" section of this policy.
Exercising Your Legal Rights
If wish to exercise you rights under the data protection legislation, please review the
“Your Rights to Access and Control Your Persona Data”
to find out how to exercise your rights.
If you need further assistance regarding your rights, please contact us, Phone Number: 1 (952) 253-1234, E-mail:
privacy@digitalriver.com
.
You have the right to report to your local Supervisory Authority where you feel as though your rights under data protection legislation have not been appropriately considered.  However, before doing so, please contact us directly as we are committed to working with you to help resolve any concerns about your privacy.
Privacy Policy for California Residents
Your Rights
In addition to the above, California residents have the right to make the following requests with respect to their personal information under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”):
Data Access and Portability.
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about the personal information we have collected, used, disclosed, or sold about you in the previous 12 months.
Deletion.
You can request that we delete your personal information that we collected from you to the extent required under the CCPA.
Disclosure.
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information about our collection and use of your Personal Information over the last twelve (12) months, including:
the categories of personal information we collected about you,
the categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you,
our business or commercial purpose for collecting that personal information,
the categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information,
the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (also called a data portability request).
where there has been a disclosure for a business purpose, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
To exercise any of your rights under the CCPA, please send us a request using the information in the
“Your Rights to Access and Control Your Persona Data”
section of this Privacy Policy or by calling (866) 585-3251. We may ask you for additional information to verify your identity and reserve the right to limit or deny your request if you have failed to provide information enough to verify your identity or satisfy our legal and business requirements.  We will respond to the e-mail we have on file within forty-five days of your verifiable request.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded.  If we determine that you request warrants a fee, we will advise you as to the ground for that decision and provide you with an estimate of the cost before we complete your request.
Our Use and sharing of your Personal Information
As discussed in more detail above, Digital River may disclose your personal information to a third party for a business purpose. However, Digital River will not sell your personal information as that term is defined by the CCPA. When we disclose personal information for a business purpose, we enter a contract that requires the recipient to both keep that personal information confidential and not use it for any purpose except in performance of our contractual commitments.
In the preceding 12 months, Digital River has collected or disclosed the following categories of information. Digital River has not, and does not today, sell personal information:
Category
We Collect
We Disclose
We Sell
Identifiers
Yes
Yes
No
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Yes
No
No
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Yes
No
No
Internet or other similar network activity
Yes
Yes
No
Geolocation data
Yes
Yes
No
Professional or employment-related information
Yes
Yes
No
California Shine the Light Law
California's "Shine the Light" law (Civil Code Section §1798.83) permits users of the Site that are California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of personal information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please send an email to
privacy@digitalriver.com
.
Privacy Policy for Brazilian Residents
Your Rights
If you are located in Brazil, Article 18 of the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (“LGPD”) provides you with certain rights with respect to your Personal Data.  You have the right to obtain the following information from the Data Controller:
confirmation of the existence of processing;
access to the data;
correction of incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated data;
anonymization, blocking, or elimination of unnecessary or excessive data or of data processed in noncompliance with the provisions of the LGPD;
portability of the data to other service providers or suppliers of products, at your express request, according to the LGPD, and subject to the protection of business and industrial secrets in the process;
deletion of Personal Data processed with your consent, except in the situations set forth in Article 16 of the LGPD;
information on the public and private entities with which we have shared data;
information on the possibility of not providing consent and on the consequences of such denial;
revocation of the consent, pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 5 of Article 8 of the LGPD; and
You also have the right to review decisions that are based on automated processing of personal data where the decision is carried out exclusively by automated means and affects your interests. In processing your transaction, Digital River does not make decisions using exclusively automated means where the decision would also negatively affect your interests.
Exercising Your Rights
If wish to exercise you rights under the LGPD, please review the
“Your Rights to Access and Control Your Persona Data”
section for how to exercise your rights.
If you need further assistance regarding your rights, please contact us, Phone Number: 1 (952) 253-1234, E-mail:
privacy@digitalriver.com
.
You have the right to report to your local Supervisory Authority where you feel as though your rights under data protection legislation have not been appropriately considered.  However, before doing so, please contact us directly as we are committed to working with you to help resolve any concerns about your privacy.
Privacy Policy for South Korea Residents
By finalizing a sale on the Site, you are consenting to Digital River’s processing of your personal information as described in this Privacy Policy.  In processing your personal information, it may be necessary for us to transfer your personal information or consign the processing to the following parties:
Third-Party Provision of Personal Information
Digital River, Inc. and Digital River Ireland Ltd
Type of Information:
Email address, name, IP address, address, phone number, account information
Purpose:
Transaction processing and execution, product registration, account opening, customer support, general product and service marketing, and other accompanying purpose
Retention Period:
As long as you continue to use the Site, and thereafter as permitted or required by applicable law or to satisfy Digital River’s business requirements
The Supplier Whose Name and/or Logo Appears on this Site
Type of Information:
Transaction information, such as email address, name, IP address, address, phone number
Purpose:
Transaction reporting and fulfillment, product registration, warranty and technical support, account opening
Retention Period:
As detailed in Supplier’s privacy policy
You are entitled to withhold your consent to the sharing of data with the above entities by not checking the appropriate boxes during the checkout process. In that event, we will not be able to complete your transaction and will not be able to provide you with products or services.
Consignment of Handling of Personal Information
In processing your transaction or order, Digital River currently consigns processing activities to third parties as follows:
NHN Korea Cyber Payment Co., Ltd
Type of Information:
Billing information such as, email address, name, IP address, address, phone number, account information
Purpose:
Transaction payment processing
Retention Period:
7 Years
Adyen
Type of Information:
Billing information, such as email address, name, IP address, address, phone number, account information
Purpose:
Transaction payment processing
Retention Period:
7 years
Cybage Software Pvt Ltd.
Type of Information:
Email address, name, IP address, address, phone number, account information
Purpose:
System development and maintenance
Retention Period:
As long as you continue to use the Site, and thereafter as permitted or required by applicable law or to satisfy Digital River’s business requirements
Sutherland Global Services, Inc.
Type of Information:
Email address, name, IP address, address, phone number, account information
Purpose:
Customer service support
Retention Period:
As long as you continue to use the Site, and thereafter as permitted or required by applicable law or to satisfy Digital River’s business requirements
Notice to Japan Residents
If you need further assistance regarding your rights, please contact us, Phone Number: 03-6770-2741, E-mail:
privacy@digitalriver.com
.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We keep this Privacy Policy under review and will post any updates to the Site. Our changes will become effective immediately upon posting. We may also supplement or amend this Privacy Policy by placing other privacy notices on the Site. Such privacy notices will explain how we handle information specific to where that privacy notice appears and should be read together with this Privacy Policy.
A link to our previous privacy policy is included
here
.
Grievance Officer/Data Protection Officer
If you need further assistance regarding your rights, please contact us, Phone Number: 1 (952) 253-1234, E-mail:
privacy@digitalriver.com
.
How to Contact Us
If you have a question about this Privacy Policy or requests related to your Personal Data pursuant to applicable laws, no matter where you are in the world, please email us at
privacy@digitalriver.com
. If you are located in Germany, we will direct you to our external Data Protection Officer.
i
The definition of “Personal Data” is intended to encompass “Personal Information” as defined by the California Consumer Privacy act and should be interpreted as such.
Sub-policy 6
https://stripe.com/privacy:

Sub-policy 7
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 8
https://privacy.cyberlink.com/stat/policy/enu/app/privacy.html:
Entities collecting your information
Personal information we collect
How we use personal information on CyberLink’s Mobile App
Personal information we share
Children's guidelines
Your Californian Privacy Right
Information security
Information retention
Third Party Services
International transfer of information
When this privacy policy applies
Merger or sale
Changes
General
CyberLink Corporation Privacy Policy for Mobile App
Last Update: June 2024. This CyberLink Corporation Privacy Policy for Mobile App replaces and supersedes all prior versions.
This CyberLink Corporation Privacy Policy for Mobile App along with the
CyberLink Corporation General Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy
govern your use of and access to our Mobile App.  When you use our services, you trust us with your information. This Privacy Policy is intended to help you understand your right to privacy.
Our Privacy Policy explains:
What information we collect and why we collect it.
How we use that information.
The choices we offer, including how to access, update and manage your information.
We tried to keep this policy as simple, clear and easy to comprehend as possible. You should read this Policy carefully in order to protect your right to privacy.
Entities collecting your information
We, CyberLink Corporation  (“CyberLink,” “we,” “us,” or “our”), will collect information related to you in our mobile applications, excluding U and FaceMe (collectively "Mobile App"). Information collected through the Mobile App may be stored, transferred and processed by CyberLink Corp. in the United States, CyberLink Corp. in Taiwan, and CyberLink Inc. in Japan (collectively,  “CyberLink Group”). All transfers will occur in compliance with data transfer  requirements of applicable laws and regulations.
Personal information we collect
Personal information in this  Privacy Policy refers to information that could identify, locate or contact a  natural person. We collect personal information to provide better services to  all of our users – from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak,  to more complex things like which ads you’ll find most useful to you. When  using our Mobile App to view our products, we may collect certain personal information  in the following ways:
Personal       information you give us
Analytic
Engaging        advertising
Email
Crash        reporting
Feedback        and suggestions
Use        of CyberLink's service
Biometric        information (photos/videos if posted on or uploaded to our Mobile App)
How we use personal information on CyberLink’s Mobile App
CyberLink processes personal information  on our servers in many countries around the world. We may process your personal  information on a server located outside the country where you live. We will ask  for your consent before using your personal information for a purpose other  than those that are set out in this Privacy Policy.
We may use your personal information when using our Mobile App for the  following purposes:
create your CyberLink account, when needed to communicate with you;
verify your identity and entitlement to certain products or services;
communicate with you should you require technical or customer support service;
connect to you about and manage your participation in contests, offers or promotions;
Analytic
Our Mobile App includes app analytic mechanism to log your usage behavior so as to enhance our apps user
        experiences. The analytics mechanism includes information relating to your usage behavior such as how you use and
        how often you use our apps. For instances like file types (eg: photo or video), filenames, file extensions, local
        path of the files that you input to the apps. This analytics do not show information of any photo, video or any
        materials that you input to the apps. Collected information or data are aggregated for analyze, we cannot use the
        collected data to target a specific person/user. The analytics are collect via vendors name below:
Mixpanel;
Google Firebase Analytics (here’s our partner’s privacy
statement
); and
Facebook Analytics (here’s our partner’s privacy
statement
)
Engaging advertising
CyberLink allows other companies, called third-party ad servers or ad networks to display and/or serve
        advertisements within the Mobile App. These third-party ad servers or ad networks use technology to send, directly
        to your Mobile App the advertisements and links that appear on Mobile App. Our Mobile App advertising vendor as
        below:
Facebook Audience Network (here’s our partner’s privacy
statement
)
Google Admob (here’s our partner’s privacy
statement
)
Google Ads Customer Match (
click here
for more details of how Google uses Customer Match data)
Intowow Innovation
Crash reporting
Our Mobile App uses Fabrics or Google Play services to collect crash logs when the apps running on your devices
        crashed or stopped responding.
Feedback and suggestions
Your input and screenshots provided in “Feedback” / Report an Issue” pages in the Mobile App.
Use of CyberLink’s service
When you use CyberLink Cloud, DirectorZone, we may collect your usage behavior so as to enhance our Mobile App user
        experiences.
When purchasing at our Mobile App
Our Mobile App acts as a gateway for you to purchase our products online. Purchases of CyberLink products that are
        initiated from our Mobile App are actually completed on Apple App Store, Google Play, Microsoft Store or any other
        mobile application stores (collectively known as “Mobile App Stores”). In order to complete a purchase
        transaction, Mobile App Stores must collect personal information from you, including your credit card number. If you
        are interested in purchasing CyberLink software through the Mobile App Stores, please view the Privacy Statement of
        respective stores.
Biometric information
We may collect, capture, store, use, receive or otherwise obtain your photo/video or a scan of your face solely for
        the purpose of providing you with CyberLink’s service. We treat your biometric information with care and
        confidentially. We do not share, sell, rent, or trade your biometric information with third parties for any
        promotional purposes. Your biometric information will not be disclosed to, shared with or stored on any server, system
        or location outside of the device you use to access to CyberLink’s services, except for the services that
        require cloud computing such as cloud editing or certain AI processing functions.
We will never use your biometric information obtained through the Mobile App to identify any individual person or for
        authentication purposes.
If we engage a third-party  processor to process your personal information, the processor will be subject  to binding contractual obligations to: (i) only process such personal information  in accordance with our prior written instructions; and (ii) use measures to  protect the confidentiality and security of such personal information; together  with any additional requirements under applicable law. We request such  third-party processor to purge your personal information upon the termination  of relationship and upon your request for deletion.
Personal information we share
We do not share personal information  with companies, organizations and individuals outside of CyberLink unless one  of the following circumstances applies:
For       external processing and customer/technical support
We provide personal information to our affiliates or partners to process       on our behalf based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy       Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures or       provide necessary customer and technical support in response to customer’s       feedback.
For       legal reasons
We will share personal information with companies, organizations or individuals       outside of CyberLink if we have a good-faith belief that access, use,       preservation or disclosure of personal information is reasonably necessary       to:
meet        any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental        request.
enforce        applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential        violations.
detect,        prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues.
protect        against harm to the rights, property or safety of CyberLink, our users or        the public as required or permitted by law.
Children's guidelines
CyberLink is committed to protecting the privacy needs of children and we encourage parents and guardians to take an active role in their children’s online activities. The Mobile App is not intended for children under 16 years of age, and by the Mobile App’s terms of service, users affirm that they are at least 16 years old. We do not knowingly collect or use any online contact information or identifiable off-line contact information about a child without parental consent. We do not knowingly distribute personally identifiable information about children without parental consent. We do not knowingly give children the ability to post or distribute information without parental consent. We do not entice children with children-targeted games or contests that would encourage them to disclose information.
Your Californian Privacy Right
If you are a resident of  California, the following section are intend to provide you with information as  required by the California Consumer Protection Act of 2014 (CCPA) and the  California Privacy Regulation Act of 2023 (CPRA). These sections apply to  personal information defined in the beginning of this Privacy Policy.
Right to know and Right to access.
We will provide following information  upon your request, where relevant and required by the CCPA and CPRA, types of  data we may collect, sources from which data may be collected, the purposes to  collect data, the third parties that may receive your personal information, and  your personal information if we ever collect it.
Right to opt-out.
We do not sell or share your Personal Information to  any third party for a business or commercial purpose under any circumstances. However,  you have the right to opt-out of the sale or share of your personal information  in we ever notify you that we engage in such activity.
Right to correct inaccurate Personal Information.
If you believe your  personal information is not correct you may contact us and provide personal  information to replace erroneous data.
Right to Request  Deletion of Information.
You have the right to request  that we delete any information that we have collected from you. However, we are  not required to comply with a request to delete where it is necessary for us to  retain information in order to:
Complete       the transaction for which we collected the information, provide a good or       service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the       context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise       perform our contract with you.
Detect       security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or       illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities.
Debug       products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended       functionality.
Exercise       free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free       speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law.
Comply       with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code       § 1546 et. seq.).
Engage       in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research       in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and       privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible       or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided       informed consent.
Enable       solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer       expectations based on your relationship with us.
Comply       with legal obligations.
Make       other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible       with the context in which you provided it.
If you have questions or  concerns with respect to our Privacy Policy, or you want to access, delete, or  correct your Personal Information, you may contact us at:
Written       requests be sent to 15F., No.100, Minquan Rd., Xindian Dist., New Taipei       City 231, Taiwan (R.O.C.)
Attn:       Privacy Policy Team
Call       us toll free at (+1) 888-226-6030
Or       by email at:
privacy@cyberlink.com
We will respond to these  requests for the list within 30 days. Requests that come to us through other  channels may result in a delayed response.
The procedure and method of  information destruction are as follows.
1)     Destruction procedure
You can delete or request to delete your information by managing your  membership and click to delete your information. Once you click to delete your  information, your information will be deleted and removed from the cloud  storage permanently.
2)     How to destroy
Following by the aforementioned destruction procedure, we will confirm if your  information has fully destroyed and removed from the cloud storage. We do not  keep your information recorded and stored in paper documents or hardware  devices.
Information security
We are committed to protecting your interest when using our services from unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure or destruction of information we hold. In particular:
We encrypt many of our services using, for example, TLS, SHA-2, etc.
We review our information collection, storage and processing practices to guard against unauthorized access to systems.
We restrict access to       information to CyberLink’s employees, contractors and agents on a need to know basis in order to process it for us, and who are subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Information retention
We take every reasonable step to ensure that your information are only processed for the minimum period necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. The criteria for determining the duration for which we will retain your information are as follows:
(1)	we  will retain information in a form that permits identification only for as long  as:
we maintain an ongoing relationship with you (e.g., where you are an active user who logs in to our services within past two (2) years, or you are lawfully included in our mailing list and have not unsubscribed); or
your information are necessary in connection with the lawful purposes set out in this Privacy Policy, for which we have a valid legal basis (e.g., where your information are included in a contract between us and your employer, and we have a legitimate interest in processing those information for the purposes of operating our business and fulfilling our obligations under that contract; or where we have a legal obligation to retain your information),
plus:
(2)	the duration of:
any applicable limitation period under applicable law (i.e., any period during which any person could bring a legal claim against us in connection with your information, or to which your information are relevant); and
an additional two (2) month period following the end of such applicable limitation period (so that, if a person brings a claim at the end of the limitation period, we are still afforded a reasonable amount of time in which to identify any information that are relevant to that claim),
and:
(3) in addition, if any relevant legal claims are brought, we continue to process information for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
During the periods noted in paragraphs (2)a and (2)b above, we will restrict our processing of your information to storage of, and maintaining the security of, those data, except to the extent that those data need to be reviewed in connection with any legal claim, or any obligation under applicable law.
Once the periods in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) above, each to the extent applicable, have concluded, we will either:
permanently  delete or destroy the relevant information; or
anonymize  the relevant information.
Third Party  Services
When you use our Mobile App, you may  have access to services provided by third-party service providers. For example,  you may upload videos into YouTube; enable YouTube Live Streaming services; or access Google services via our  Mobile App. These third-party service providers have separate and  independent privacy policies and/or Terms of Service shown below:
YouTube API Services       Terms of Service (
https://developers.google.com/youtube/terms/api-services-terms-of-service
)
Google Privacy Policy (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
). Please specifically note       that Google Workspace APIs will never be used to develop, improve, or       train generalized AI and/or ML models of any CyberLink products and/or       services.
TikTok Privacy Policy (
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/row/privacy-policy/en
) and Terms of Service       (
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/page/row/terms-of-service/en
)
International transfer of information
Because of the international nature of our business, we transfer information within CyberLink Group, and to third parties as noted in this Privacy Policy, in connection with the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. For this reason, we transfer information to Japan, US, and Taiwan that may have different laws and data protection compliance requirements to those that apply in the country in which you are located.
Please note that when you transfer any information directly to any CyberLink Group entity established outside the jurisdiction in which you are located, we are not responsible for that transfer of information. We will nevertheless process such information, from the point at which we receive those information, in accordance with the provisions of this Privacy Policy.
Company
CyberLink Inc.
CyberLink.com Corp
Country
Japan (Shibadaimon 116 Bldg. 3F, 1-16-3, Shibadaimon, Minato-ku, Tokyo 105-0012)
US (1019 E 4th Place Suite 400, Los Angeles, CA 90013)
Date, time, and the transfer method
Whenever it happened (real-time transfer), transferred via app
Whenever it happened (real-time transfer), transferred via app
Transferred personal data*
Personal details, Demographic information, Expertise Contact details. Consent records, Purchase details, Data relating to our Sites and Apps, Employer details. Content and advertising data, Views and opinions.
Personal details, Demographic information, Expertise Contact details. Consent records, Purchase details, Data relating to our Sites and Apps, Employer details. Content and advertising data, Views and opinions.
Purpose
Providing Services and Recruitment on our Sites and Apps
Providing Services and Recruitment on our Sites and Apps
Retention period
Only for as long as we maintain an ongoing relationship with you or your Personal Data are necessary in connection with the lawful purposes, plus any applicable limitation period under applicable law and an additional two (2) month period. In addition. If any relevant legal claims are brought, we continue to Process Personal _Data for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
Only for as long as we maintain an ongoing relationship with you or your Personal Data are necessary in connection with the lawful purposes, plus any applicable limitation period under applicable law and an additional two (2) month period. In addition. If any relevant legal claims are brought, we continue to Process Personal _Data for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
Contact email
privacy@cyberlink.com
privacy@cyberlink.com
*Transferred personal data:
Personal details:
given name(s); preferred name; and photograph(s).
Demographic information:
gender; date of birth / age; salutation; title; and language preferences.
Contact details:
correspondence address; shipping address; telephone number; email address; and social media details.
Expertise:
records of your expertise, professional history, practicing details and qualification details, information about your experience, participation in meetings, seminars, advisory boards and conferences, information about your professional relationship with other individuals or institutions, language abilities and other professional skills;
Consent records:
records of any consents you have given, together with the date and time, means of consent and any related information (e.g., the subject matter of the consent).
Purchase details:
records of purchases and prices; shipping details; consignee name, address, contact telephone number and email address;
Data relating to our Sites and  Apps:
device type; device hardware; device model; device resolution; operating system; browser type; browser settings; IP address; Internet Service Provider; mobile network carrier; language settings; dates and times of connecting to a Site or App; duration of usage of a Site or App; App usage statistics; App version; SR number (for App version); App settings; Firebase Cloud ID (FCM ID); advertising ID; clickstream data; referral URL; exit URL; other technical communications information (some of which may constitute Personal Data); username; password; security login details; usage data; aggregate statistical information; and information about the way you use our Apps after you have installed and registered them (e.g. launch data, feature usage, page clicks, sign-in information, and feature vectors).
Employer details:
where you interact with us in your capacity as an employee of a third party, the name, address, telephone number and email address of your employer, to the extent relevant.
Content and advertising data:
records of your interactions with our online advertising and content, records of advertising and content displayed on pages or App screens displayed to you, and any interaction you may have had with such content or advertising (e.g., mouse hover, mouse clicks, any forms you complete in whole or in part) and any touchscreen interactions.
Views and opinions:
any views and opinions that you choose to send to us, or publicly post about us on social media platforms.
* Users can refuse to transfer their personal information abroad through the company's personal information protection manager and department in charge. If so, the company excludes the user's personal information from the overseas transfer target. However, in this case, the use of the service that necessarily entails the transfer of personal information abroad among the company's services may be restricted.
When this privacy policy applies
Our Privacy Policy does not apply to services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or websites that may be displayed to you when using our Service. Our Privacy Policy does not cover the information practices of other companies and organizations who advertise our services, and who may use cookies and other technologies to serve and offer relevant ads.
Merger or sale
If CyberLink is involved in a merger, acquisition or asset sale, we will continue to ensure the confidentiality of any information and give affected users notice before information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Changes
Our Privacy Policy may change from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We will post any privacy policy changes on this page and, if the changes are significant, we will provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of privacy policy changes).
General
This Privacy Policy shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of Taiwan without regard to conflict of law principles. You and CyberLink hereby irrevocably consent that any legal action or proceeding arising under or in connection with this Privacy Policy must be submit to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction of arbitration in Taipei, Taiwan for the purpose of arbitrating any dispute. In the event that any provision in this Privacy Policy is held to be invalid or unenforceable, the remaining provisions will remain in full force and effect. The failure of a party to enforce any right or provision of this Privacy Policy will not be deemed a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver, to be effective, must be in writing signed by the waiving party (in the case of CyberLink, by an authorized officer). You may not assign this Agreement (by operation of law or otherwise) without the prior written consent of CyberLink and any prohibited assignment will be null and void. CyberLink may assign this Privacy Policy or any rights hereunder without your consent. You agree that this Privacy Policy and the rules, restrictions and policies contained herein, and CyberLink’s enforcement thereof, are not intended to confer and do not confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than you and CyberLink. This Privacy Policy together with constitute the entire agreement between CyberLink and you with respect to the subject matter hereof. Any notice or other communication to be given hereunder will be in writing and given (a) by CyberLink via email (in each case to the address that you provide), (b) a notice on the service, or (c) by you via email to contact
privacy@cyberlink.com
or to such other addresses as CyberLink may specify in writing. The date of receipt shall be deemed the date on which such notice is transmitted.
YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, BY ENTERING INTO THIS PRIVACY POLICY, YOU WAIVE THE RIGHT TO GO TO COURT OR TO PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION.